/nfs/nlg/semmt/projects/bigmech/bio-resources/PubMedCentral-Corpus/articles.C-H/Cytotherapy/Cytotherapy_2014_Jul_16(7)_893-905.nxml
('Myb', 'MYB', 'increases')
The c-Myb (MYB) protein was found to be associated with over 10,000 promoters as the evidence of being a master transcription factor in MCF-7 cell model [

('LMO2', 'EN1', 'increases')
H217 and F238, at the interface between SCL and LMO2, are conserved in hematopoietic bHLH proteins (LYL1, TAL2), but not in neuronal and muscle proteins (NeuroD1, HEN1, HEN2, and MyoD, 

('Raf', 'MEK', 'adds_modification')
In the MM, by simply altering the rate equation for Raf-catalyzed phosphorylation of MEK in a manner consistent with competitive inhibition, and likewise for the receptor inhibitor, the MM predicts a modest 58% decrease in ERK* (
Dysregulated signaling through the RAS/RAF/mitogen-activated protein kinase (MEK)/extracellular signal-regulated kinase (ERK) signaling pathway due to mutations in K-Ras and B-Raf are common events in CRC.
Numerous agents targeting mTOR, PI-3K, growth factor receptors, and related tyrosine kinases, Ras, Raf, and B-Raf, S6K, MEK1/2 have been tested to treat cancer.
The Raf1 kinase inhibitor (GW5074) and different MEK inhibitors (U0126 and AZD6244) were used to treat HCC cells to identify their effects on HCC cell growth and ABC proteins expression 
Both Raf1 inhibitor (GW5074) and MEK inhibitors (U0126 and AZD6244) suppressed HCC cell growth in a dose dependent manner.
The objective of this investigation was to elucidate the interaction between two key kinases within the MAPK pathway (Raf1 and MEK) and ABC proteins expression in HCC.
Highly selective inhibitors which inhibited the Raf1 kinase (GW5074) and the MEK activity (U0126 and AZD6244) were applied to identify their effects on the MRP1 and MRP3 protein expression.
The Raf1 inhibitor GW5074 and MEK inhibitor U0126 were purchased from Calbiochem (Darmstadt, Germany).
The antibodies for western blot were purchased from: Actin (A1978) (Sigma Aldrich, Steinheim, Germany); p-ERK (#4377), p-MEK (#9121), MEK (#4694), p-Raf1 (#9427), and Raf1 (#9422) (Cell Signaling, Frankfurt, Germany); MRP3 (sc-20767), ERK (sc-135900), and the secondary antibodies goat anti rabbit (sc-2004) as well as goat anti mouse (sc-2005) (Santa Cruz, Heidelberg, Germany); MRP1 (ab32574) (Abcam, Cambridge, UK).
ABC protein: ATP binding cassette proteins; EGFR: Epidermal growth factor receptor; ERK: Mitogen-activated protein kinase; MAPK: Mitogen activated protein kinase; MEK: Mitogen-activated protein kinase kinase; MRP1: Multidrug resistance-associated protein 1; MRP3: Multidrug resistance-associated protein 3; PDGFR: Platelet-derived growth factor receptor; PGP: P-glycoprotein; Raf: Proto-oncogene serine/threonine-protein kinase; siRNA: Small interfering RNA; VEGFR: Vascular endothelial growth factor receptor.
Conversely, knockdown of Mirk/Dyrk1B by siRNA led to up-regulated activation of c-Raf-MEK-ERK1/2 pathway and subsequent changes in cell cycle proteins (cyclin D1, p27kip1), accompanied by increased growth rate and cells from G0/G1 into S of cell cycle which could be blocked by U0126 in a dose-dependent manner, indicating Mirk/Dyrk1B may sequester MAPK/ERK pathway, and vice versa.
The Ras/Raf/mitogen-activated protein kinase (MEK)/extracellular signal-regulated kinase (ERK) pathway (Ras-Raf-MEK-ERK pathway) is an intracellular key signaling pathway that transmits mitogenic stimuli from the extracellular environment to the nucleus of the cell by multiple phosphorylation steps [
All human cells contain B-Raf, C-Raf, MEK, and EGF, usually in wild-type form, although it is increasingly being appreciated that mutant forms of all of these enzymes are far more widespread than initially thought.
In addition, we showed that this compound suppressed cell proliferation in both cell lines by inhibiting the PI3K/Akt/mTOR pathway as well as the Raf/MEK/ERK pathway.
On the other hand, this drug did not inhibit the phosphorylation and expression of EGFR, MEK, PI3K and PDK1, and upstream receptors of Raf/MEK/ERK and PI3K/Akt/mTOR pathways.
The Raf/MEK/ERK signal transduction pathway is present in all eukaryotic cells.
This pivotal pathway relays extracellular signals to the nucleus via a cascade of specific phosphorylation events involving Raf, MEK, and ERK to regulate fundamental cellular processes, including proliferation, differentiation, and cell survival [
Effective inhibitors specific for many of the key components of the Raf/MEK/ERK or PI3K/Akt/mTOR pathway have been developed.
Our findings have important implications for metastatic RCC therapy because they provide a rationale for dual inhibition of the Raf/MEK/ERK and PI3K/Akt/mTOR pathways.
Previous reports indicated the efficacy of combining Raf/MEK/ERK inhibitors with PI3K/Akt/mTOR inhibitors.
Through serine/threonine phosphorylation, Raf activates a family of dual specificity kinases known as MAPK kinases (MAP2K) or MAPK/ERK kinases (MEKs).
Presumably, the epigenetic changes might comprise pathways involved in chromatin remodelling and/or the Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK pathway.
However, other signals impinge on mTORC1, including the Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK1/2/p90
Raf activates MEK which in turn phosphorylates and activates ERK1/2 [
Most B-Raf mutations involve the V600E amino acid substitution, resulting in constitutive activation of the MEK-ERK signaling pathway.
In the present study a recently conceived 4-gene marker panel covering the Wnt and Ras-Raf-MEK-MAPK signaling pathways was used to analyze 20 colorectal serrated lesions and 41 colorectal adenoma samples and to determine the percentage of each of the above-mentioned potentially precancerous lesions carrying at least one of the four above-mentioned genes in a mutated form. 
In serrated lesions the Ras-Raf-MEK-MAPK pathway was significantly more often altered than the Wnt pathway (60% 
The Ras-Raf-MEK-MAPK signaling cascade was solely affected in 92.3 and 56% of the serrated lesion and adenoma cases with mutations, respectively, whereas the Wnt signaling cascade was solely mutated in 15.4 and 68% of the serrated lesion and adenoma cases with mutations, respectively.
Moreover, in a recent study by our group, in which CRC samples underwent a mutational analysis with the same oligonucleotide primer panel used in the present report, it was shown that 45% of mutation-positive CRC only exhibited alterations in the Wnt signaling cascade and 38% of mutation-positive CRC only exhibited alterations in the Ras-Raf-MEK-MAPK signaling cascade [
By making use of a recently conceived combination of oligonucleotide primers it could be shown that: (1) In 65% of the analyzed serrated lesions and in 61% of the traditional adenomas of the colon and rectum, at least one of the four genes studied was altered; (2) in 92.3% of the serrated lesions with mutations and in 76% of the adenoma samples with mutations either the Ras-Raf-MEK-MAPK or the Wnt signaling cascade was altered; (3) in 35% of the serrated lesions and in 39% of the adenomas neither the Wnt pathway nor the Ras-Raf-MEK-MAPK pathway were affected.
Frequency of genetic alterations affecting the Wnt or the Ras-Raf-MEK-MAPK pathway in the colorectal lesions analyzed.
The frequency of genetic alterations affecting the Ras-Raf-MEK-MAPK signaling pathway is significantly higher than that affecting the Wnt pathway (
Anatomical location of the colorectal lesions with an altered Wnt or Ras-Raf- MEK-MAPK pathway.
The frequency of genetic alterations affecting the Wnt signaling pathway is significantly higher than that affecting the Ras-Raf-MEK-MAPK signaling pathway in adenomas arising in the distal colon (
The frequency of genetic alterations affecting the Ras-Raf-MEK-MAPK signaling pathway is significantly higher than that affecting the Wnt signaling pathway in serrated lesions arising in the proximal colon (
Zoledronic acid enhances fluvastatin and paclitaxel activity against T24 in a synergistic manner and this is mediated largely by inhibition of both the Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK and PI3K/AKT signaling pathways via isoprenylation inhibition.
The effects of the fluvastatin and zoledronic acid on signal transduction pathways of Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK and PI3K /AKT were investigated under the same conditions as above.
Abbreviations are the following: CD10: 100 kDa transmembrane metallo-endopeptidase; CD14: cluster of differentiation 14; TLR1: Toll-like receptor 1; TLR2: Toll-like receptor 2; TLR3: Toll-like receptor 3; NGF-beta: Nerve growth factor beta; Her2: Human Epidermal Growth Factor Receptor-2; ERbeta: Estrogen receptor beta; FGF-2: Fibroblast growth factor 2; VEGF: vascular endothelial growth factor; IKKbeta: inhibitor of nuclear factor kappa-B kinase subunit beta; DAXX: death domain-associated protein 6; PKC delta: protein kinase C delta; RhoA: Ras homolog gene family member A; PKCalpha: protein kinase C alpha; Akt: protein kinase B; P38: P38 mitogen-activated protein kinases; MK2: Mitogen-activated protein kinase-activated protein kinase 2 (MAPKAPK2); Phk: Phosphorylase kinase (PhK); PTEN: phosphatase and TENsin homolog; PRKD1: Serine/threonine-protein kinase D1; PPM1A: protein phosphatase 1A (formerly 2C), magnesium-dependent, alpha isoform; TRAF6: tumor necrosis factor receptor-associated factor 6; Raf, MEK, ERK: Mitogen activated protein (MAP) kinase pathways; Bax: Bcl-2 associated X protein; PEA-15: astrocytic phosphoprotein PEA-15; XIAP: X-linked inhibitor of apoptosis; p66Shc: 66 kDa isoform of ShcA (Src homology 2 domain containing transforming protein 2); G6PD: glucose 6-phosphate dehydrogenase; HDM2: Human double minute 2 homolog; IF: intermediate filaments; MAPs: microtubule-associated proteins; GFAP: Glial fibrillary acidic protein; GRIFIN: galectin-related interfiber protein; HDAC6: histone deacetylase 6; STAT2 and 3: signal transducer and activator of transcription 2 and 3; HSF-1: heat shock factor 1; GATA-1: globin transcription factor 1; Snail: zinc finger protein that binds and inhibits E-cadherin promoter to induce epithelial mesenchymal transformation; eIF4E: eukaryotic translation initiation factor 4E; eIF4G: eukaryotic translation initiation factor 4G; AUF1: AU-rich element (ARE)-binding protein; p90 ribosomal S6 kinase; Smad-Smurf2: Smad ubiquitination regulatory factor 2; p27kip1: cyclin-dependent kinase inhibitor p27kip1; Fbx4: Fbox only protein 4.
Activation of the Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK pathway induces RET downregulation, growth inhibition, and differentiation in MTC cells by inducing expression and secretion of LIF, which activates STAT3 in an autocrine/paracrine mode.
GRKs phosphorylate PAK, MEKK/Raf, MEK, MAPK, SAP/JNK, p38, Arrestins, beta2-adrenergic receptor, and other proteins.
The Ras-Raf-MEK signaling pathway is fundamental to cellular metabolism and growth in humans; inherited mutations involving this pathway cause disorders of early growth and development (
KSR2_921 was expressed at a lower level and had a reduced ability to bind B-Raf and facilitate MEK and ERK phosphorylation.
Using confocal microscopy, we investigated the intracellular localization of WT and mutant KSR2 expressed in Cos7 cells and its colocalization with endogenous B-Raf, MEK, or ERK.
To determine whether KSR2 mutations affect Ras-Raf-MEK-ERK signaling, HEK293 cells were transfected with Flag-tagged WT and mutant forms of KSR2 and stimulated with EGF.
(A) Confocal microscopy of EGF-stimulated Cos7 cells showing the colocalization of transiently expressed KSR2 WT and the frameshift mutation, L822Pfsx26 (green), with endogenous B-Raf, MEK, and ERK (red) in the cytoplasm and plasma membrane (inset).
Subcellular Localization of KSR2 Mutants and Colocalization with B-Raf, MEK, and ERK, Related to 
Cells were coimmunostained with anti-Flag (green) and either: anti-B-Raf, anti-MEK or anti-ERK (red) antibodies and analyzed by confocal microscopy.
Other Ras-MAPK components such as Raf, MEK and ERK are also being investigated and are proving more successful drug targets [
Compared with normal bladder tissues, phosphorylation levels of B-Raf (Ser455), C-Raf (Ser338), MEK (1/2) and ERK significantly increased in bladder carcinoma tissues.
The NCFC syndromes comprise neurofibromatosis (NF) and the Noonan (NS), Costello (CS), LEOPARD (LS) and cardio-facious-cutaneous (CFC) syndromes, which are correlated with autosomal-dominant germ-line mutations within either the core components (Ras, B-Raf, Raf-1, MEK) or modulators of the Ras/ERK pathway (NF1, SHP2, SOS and Spred).
Following activation, Raf phosphorylates and activates mitogen-activated protein kinase (MAP) kinase (MEK) which in turn phosphorylates and activates the MAP kinases extracellular signal-regulated protein kinases ERK1 and ERK2 [
The activation of the MEK/ERK signaling pathway by Raf has been correlated with inhibition of programmed cell death.
Treatment with the MEK inhibitor PD98059 blocked the anti-apoptotic activity of B-Raf, indicating that the activation of the Raf-MEK-ERK signaling pathway is necessary for the anti-apoptotic role of B-Raf in Rat-1 fibroblasts [
In addition to the well-established target MEK, Raf may use other effectors to inhibit programmed cell death.
It has been shown that Raf-1 promotes cell survival in a MEK/ERK-independent manner via antagonizing apoptosis signal-regulating kinase-1 (ASK-1) [
The Ser/Thr-kinase B-Raf represents an important signaling element of the Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK pathway [
Raf is the MAPKKK in the first MAPK pathway identified, the Ras-Raf-MEK-ERK pathway.
A recent example is the scaffold KSR2, member of the extended Raf family and well known for its role in coordinating Raf-MEK-ERK complexes [
They are regulated by phosphorylation via the classical mitogen-activated protein kinase (MAPK) pathway involving the GTPase Ras, which activates the serine-threonine kinases Raf, MEK and ERK.
The transduction of a cellular signal as it propagates through the MAPK cascades, exemplified by the Raf/MEK/ERK module, is predominantly controlled by phosphorylation events where typically, each kinase in the cascade is activated by an upstream kinase and inactivated by relevant phosphatases.
The canonical ERK pathway consists of three kinase tiers: Raf, MEK (MAPK and ERK kinase) and ERK.
ERK/MAPK scaffolds, in the narrow sense, assemble two or all three tiers of the canonical ERK pathway (Raf, MEK and ERK), thus - when expressed at optimal stoichiometry - facilitating and accelerating ERK activation, but at the same time restricting signal amplification.
KSR1, which binds to Raf, MEK and ERK, belongs to this category.
Scaffold proteins in the broader sense associate with one or more members of the MAPK pathway within a larger complex or protein platform, such as paxillin, which interacts with Raf, MEK and ERK within the focal adhesion complex [
The possibilities include (1) direct interaction of caveolin-1 and IQGAP1, (2) sequential or (3) simultaneous interaction with the Raf-MEK-ERK cassette, possibly through dimerization of Raf, MEK and/or ERK [
Our data show that the phorbol ester stimulated pathway PKC-Ras-Raf-MEK-ERK is broken down into two modules, of which one, PKC-Ras-(C-)Raf, is assembled at the caveolae with the help of caveolin-1, and the other one, (B-)Raf-MEK-ERK, is tethered to the actin cytoskeleton with the help of IQGAP1.
Insulin-like growth factor I (IGF-I) is a hormone that promotes proliferation, differentiation, and survival in a number of cells types mediated principally through PI3K/Akt, and Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK pathways (
The binding of NGF to TrkA activates the PI3K-Akt (phosphatidylinositol 3-kinase-Akt) and Raf-MEK-ERK (Raf-MAPK/extracellular signal-regulated kinase kinase-extracellular signal-regulated kinase) signalling pathways, which promote the growth and survival of sympathetic neurons.
NGF deprivation decreases the activity of the PI3K-Akt and Raf-MEK-ERK survival pathways, but increases the activity of the MLK-JNK-c-Jun (mixed lineage kinase-c-Jun N-terminal kinase-Jun proto-oncogene) pathway, which is required for the increased expression of BH3-only proteins and for mitochondrial cytochrome 
The binding of NGF to its receptor TrkA can also activate the Raf-MEK-ERK signalling pathway.
The signaling cascades downstream of RTKs and NRTKs include mainly the Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK, JAK/STAT and the PI3K/AKT pathways.
In particular, the Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK signaling cascade has a pivotal role in the molecular circuitry of CRPC, and the majority of the RTKs upregulated in prostate cancer have been shown to activate Ras.
The Raf/MEK/ERK signaling cascades that leads to phosphorylation/inactivation of Bad and upregulation of the anti-apoptotic Bcl-2 family members is critical for the survival of 22Rv1 cells and sorafenib, by targeting this signaling cascade is highly efficacious in killing these cells.
We determined whether and to which extent sorafenib might mediate its pro-apoptotic action by inhibiting the Raf/MEK/ERK pathway.
One of the best-characterized targets of sorafenib is the Raf/MEK/ERK pathway.
With regard to the lack of ERK phosphorylation in PC3 cells, it has been previously reported that metastatic cell lines express low levels of the proteins involved in the Raf/MEK/ERK axis.
In prostate cancer, the tumor stroma activates RTKs in the prostate cancer cells via the secretion of cytokines (e.g., PDGF, VEGF), hence stimulating the oncogenic signaling cascades Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK and PI3K/AKT.
To that end, lovastatin was shown to induce apoptosis in AML cells by downregulating the pro-survival Raf-MEK-ERK pathway.
It has been demonstrated that Ras, a GTP-binding protein, is a common upstream activator of the Raf/MEK pathway.
Raf-1 dependent phosphotransferase activity is measured in a kinase reaction using recombinant MEK1 unactive as a Raf-1 substrate over PC12 lysates where Raf-1 was immunoprecipitated using anti-Raf-1 antibody (Santa Cruz, Biotechnology).
Therefore, the above results together suggest that inhibition of the PI3K/AKT and MEK/ERK pathways by atorvastatin in KRAS mutant NSCLC cells correlates with disruption of the Kras/Raf and Kras/PI3K complexes irrespective of the PIK3CA and PTEN statuses.
A recent report describes that ERK2, a downstream kinase of Ras-Raf-MEK-ERK pathway, can directly phosphorylate components of WAVE2 complex, WAVE2 and Abi1, essential for interaction of WAVE complex with Arp2/3 and actin to mediate actin polymerization and lamellipodia formation.
In the cells, Jak-Stat, p38MAPK, PI3K-AKT-mTOR, and Ras-Raf-MEK-ERK pathways are interdependent, interconnected signaling pathways that are responsible for regulating, integrating, and balancing various signals from exogenous or endogenous stimulators, including growth factors, cytokines, and stress stimuli (
As they are almost exclusively activated downstream of extracellular signal-regulated kinases 1 and 2 (ERK1/2), therapeutic intervention by RSK inhibition is less likely to produce such severe side effects as those observed following inhibition of the upstream master regulators Raf, MEK and ERK1/2.
Mutational activation of RAS proteins is associated with the occurrence of almost 30% of all human tumors, but due to off-target and severe side effects clinical trials based on small molecule inhibitors targeting participating downstream kinases including Raf, MEK and ERK1/2 have so far not been very successful.
Furthermore, AKT phosphorylates C-Raf Ser259 that leads to inhibition of the MEK/ERK pathway.
c-Raf kinase activity assay is based on the biochemical reaction using inactive recombinant MEK1 as a c-Raf substrate.
Rasfonin clearly inhibited c-Raf, MEK and ERK phosphorylation, but had no significant effect on total MEK and ERK levels (
ADCY5 knockout mice showed increased longevity as a result of activating Raf/MEK/ERK signaling and cAMP levels.
P27 maintains PHLPP expression, which inhibits Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK/ p90RSK/S6 cascade.
Recent evidence indicates that Raf Kinase Inhibitory Protein regulates the mitotic spindle assembly checkpoint by controlling Aurora B Kinase activity, and the mechanism involves Raf/MEK/ERK signaling.
Activated Raf-1 was localized on early mitotic kinetochores, activation of the MAP kinase cascade mimicked effects of RKIP depletion, and inhibition of ERK1,2 signaling by either drugs, dominant-negative MEK, or siRNA for Raf-1 rescued defects caused by RKIP loss.
RKIP, Raf Kinase Inhibitory Protein; MAP kinase, mitogen activated protein kinase; ERK, extracellular signal regulated kinase; MEK, MAP/ERK kinase; PKC, protein kinase C
Cell proliferation is regulated by multiple pathways such as the Raf-MEK-ERK, NF-kB or phosphatidylinositol- 3 kinase (PI3K)-AKT pathways
[
Whereas the Raf/MEK/ERK signaling pathway is well studied in relation to cell proliferation, apoptosis, differentiation, and immune responses (
The canonical MAPK cascade is widely associated with cell proliferation and consists of Ras/Raf/MEK/(MAPK)Erk.
PAK phosphorylates two mediators of the MAP kinase pathway, MEK1 and Raf1, at Ser298 and at Ser338, respectively.
The total Raf1 and ERK1/2 protein level did not change, but those of K-RAS, p-Raf1, MEK1, p-MEK1, and p-ERK1/2 decreased.
A previous study showed that the total Raf1, ERK1/2, or MEK1 protein level was unchanged when RAS/MAPK signaling pathways were activated.
Each dimer can subsequently trigger various intracellular signaling pathways, including those of PI3K/Akt, Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK, and STATs, which all play important roles in cellular oncogenic processes such as proliferation, survival, motility, and angiogenesis. 
These effects are dependent on Akt down-regulation, vitamin D3 disassociation with Raf1, and subsequent activation of Raf/MEK/ERK2 MAPK signaling.
The Ras-Raf-MEK-MAPK pathway has its own distinct downstream effects, but also converges with the PI3K-AKT pathway.
A good example is that combined treatment with proto-oncogene B-Raf (BRAF) inhibitor dabrafenib and mitogen-activated protein kinase (MAPK) kinase (MEK) inhibitor trametinib delays the development of treatment resistance in patients with BRAF-positive metastatic malignant melanoma
Besides, sorafenib combined with cytotoxic drug shows an impossible synergism as that sorafenib inhibits the Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK pathway, which will prevent activation of the multidrug resistance pathway that mainly induce the failure of chemotherapy in HCC
The signal initiated by RTKs is transduced and amplified through downstream molecule cascades, such as Ras-MAPK, Ras-Raf-MEK-ERK-Elk, and the pro-survival AKT/phosphoinositide 3-hydroxykinase pathway [for an outstanding review, see Patra 
Activation of the Raf Sarcoma (RAS) family of GTPases by growth factors or by RAS mutation then drives activation of the RAF kinase family (ARAF, BRAF, CRAF) with subsequent phosphorylation and activation of MEK kinases (MEK 1 and 2) and extracellular signal- regulated kinases (ERK 1 and 2).
However, the increased insulin concentrations increase signalling via the kinases of the MAPK pathway {p21Ras, Raf, MEK [MAPK/ERK (extracellular-signal-regulated kinase) kinase] and ERK} to increase cell proliferation and survival.
Both Raf/mitogen activated protein kinase kinase (MEK)/extracellular signal-regulated kinase (ERK) and phosphoinositide 3-kinase(PI3K)/Akt/mammalian target of rapamycin (mTOR) pathways are over-expressed and/or over-activated in pituitary tumors (
Loss of menin expression is associated with over-expression of the Raf/MEK/ERK and P13K/AKT/mTOR pathways in pancreatic tumors (
BRAF is a member of the Raf family of serine threonine kinases (ARAF, BRAF, CRAF) which are part of the Ras/ Raf/MEK/ERK mitogen-activated protein kinase (MAPK) signalling pathway.
Unconjugated B-Raf antibody was from Santa Cruz Biotechnology (sc-5284), pMEK1/2 antibody from Cell Signaling Technology (9121), anti-FLAG M2 from Sigma.
For the pharmacological evaluation we generated double stable cells constitutively expressing either cSTKpep-3, wild-type MEK1(WT) or kinase-inactive MEK1(KD) substrates in combination with Tet-inducible B-Raf(V600E).
Moreover, the observed potencies of a panel of selective in-house B-Raf inhibitors correlated very well in cSTKpep-3 and MEK1(WT) TR-FRET-assays (R
The Raf-MEK-ERK pathway is commonly activated in human cancers, largely attributable to the extracellular signal-regulated kinases (ERKs) being a common downstream target of growth factor receptors, Ras, and Raf.
In addition, MEK1/2 kinases are activated by Raf (MAPK kinase kinase) [
The growth factor mediated activation of the RAS/Raf/MEK/ERK/RSK1 pathway is another mechanism whereby
there can be crosstalk regulation of the AKT/mTOR signaling pathway.
Raf-MEK-ERK1/2 forms a regulatory complex with ENaC and inhibits its function.
Interruption of ERK signalling may occur by (1) hyperphosphorylation of Raf and MEK 1 and 2, (2) dephosphorylation of aminoacidic residues of ERK and (3) sequestration of ERK in the nucleus.
In regard to the levels of phosphorylation of Raf and MEK, it is possible that ERK, apart from phosphorylating downstream substrates, could also phosphorylate upstream targets, such as those two kinases [
Studies have focused in 3 proteins: Ras, Raf and MEK.
Previously we have reported that acute exposure to ammonium activated ouabain/Na,K-ATPase signalling pathway, which includes Src, EGF receptor, Raf, Ras, MEK and ERK
The released HB-EGF activates (phosphorylates) the EGF receptor (inhibited by AG1478), leading to activation of the MAP kinase cascade, Ras (inhibited by bumetanide), Raf and MEK (inhibited by U0126), with activation of MEK causing ERK1/2 phosphorylation.
Active immune strategies aimed at interfering with the Ras-Raf-MEK pathway in NSCLC are also incipient exploring the use of a Ras peptide based vaccine [
The Ras-Raf-MEK-ERK MAPK pathway is a particularly well studied MAPK pathway unique to metazoans and consists of a three-tiered kinase cascade from Raf-to-ERK.

('GATA1', 'GATA6', 'increases')
The evolutionary conserved GATA family of tissue- and organ-specific vertebrate transcription factors (GATA-binding proteins 1 to 6; GATA1 to GATA6) consists of two zinc finger domains.

('RUNX2', 'RUNX1', 'increases')
The mammalian RUNX family of nuclear hetero-dimeric transcription factors includes three members, Runt-related transcription factor 1 (RUNX1), RUNX2 and RUNX3, which have pivotal roles in the regulation of normal development and tumorigenesis.
The RUNX (Runt-related transcription factor) family consists of three members, RUNX1, RUNX2 and RUNX3.
RUNX1 and RUNX2 were essential for hematopoiesis and osteogenesis, respectively.

('BACH2', 'BACH1', 'increases')
Nrf1 (NF-E2 related factor-1) and Nrf2 (NF-E2 related factor-2) are two oxidative stress sensitive transcription factors that belong to the CNC/bZIP family of transcription factors consisting of NF-E2, Nrf1, Nrf2, Nrf3, BACH1, and BACH2 [

('TCF3', 'RUNX1', 'increases')
The pruned dataset contains 413 samples belonging to seven different leukemia types: class 1 = hyperdiploid (115 samples), class 2 = TCF3-PBX1 (40 samples), class 3 = ETV6_RUNX1 (99 samples), class 4 = MLL (30 samples), class 5 = PH (23 samples), class 6 = hypodiploid (23 samples), and class 7 = T-ALL (83 samples).

('BRAF', 'MEK1', 'adds_modification')
For western blotting the following antibodies were used: rabbit anti-ppMEK1/2 and mouse anti-myc 9B11 (Cell Signaling Technology); mouse anti-NRAS (C-20), rabbit anti-ERK2 (C-14), rabbit anti-ARAF (C-20), mouse anti-BRAF (F-7) (Santa Cruz Biotechnology); mouse anti-Tubulin, and mouse anti-ppERK1/2 (Sigma); mouse anti-CRAF (for western blotting) (BD Transduction Laboratories).
(A and B) Structure of the MEK1-KSR2-BRAF ternary complex (
Children with germ-line mutations in KRAS, BRAF, MEK1 and MEK2 develop Cardio-facio-cutaneous syndrome (CFC), characterized by abnormal heart, craniofacial, and skin development.
Trametinib, an allosteric inhibitor of MEK1 and MEK2, has recently been shown to improve OS when compared to cytotoxic chemotherapy in BRAF mutated melanoma, though response rates are lower than those observed with the single agent vemurafenib.

('Ca2+', 'PKC', 'increases_activity')
WHO: World Health Organisation; ART: Assisted reproductive technology; HFEA: Human Fertilisation and Embryology Authority; IVF: In-vitro fertilisation; ICSI: Intracytoplasmic sperm injection; CG: Cortical granule; PN: Pro-nuclear; Ca2+: Calcium; IP3: Inositol trisphosphate; ER: Endoplasmic reticulum; PLC: Phospholipase C; PIP2: Phosphotidylinositol 4,5-bisphosphate; DAG: Diacylglycerol; PKC: Protein kinase C; PAWP: Post-acrosomal sheath WW domain-binding protein; NLS: Nuclear localisation signal; OAD: Oocyte activation deficiency; AOA: Artificial oocyte activation; MOAT: Mouse oocyte activation test; PIV: Particle image velocimetry.

('STAT1', 'IRF1', 'increases')
For example, similarly to the observation that unphosphorylated STAT1 could mediate LMP2 transcription in collaboration with IRF1 [

('DAG', 'RASGRP1', 'adds_modification')
ACP5, acid phosphatase 5, tartrate resistant; AIF1, allograft inflammatory factor 1; ASB2, ankyrin repeat and SOCS box containing 2; ASCL2, achaete-scute complex homolog 2 (Drosophila); BMP1, bone morphogenetic protein 1; CCR5, chemokine (C-C motif) receptor 5; Cd55, CD55 antigen; CDH5, cadherin 5, type 2 (vascular endothelium); CDK5R1, cyclin-dependent kinase 5, regulatory subunit 1 (p35); CITED1, Cbp/p300-interacting transactivator, with Glu/Asp-rich carboxy-terminal domain, 1; ETV5, ets variant 5; F11R, F11 receptor; F13A1, coagulation factor XIII, A1 polypeptide; FCGR3A, Fc fragment of IgG, low affinity IIIa, receptor (CD16a); FGL2, fibrinogen-like 2; FUT7, fucosyltransferase 7 (alpha (1,3) fucosyltransferase); GPR56, G protein-coupled receptor 56; HOXA1, homeobox A1; HSD11B1, hydroxysteroid (11-beta) dehydrogenase 1; ID1, inhibitor of DNA binding 1, dominant negative helix-loop-helix protein; ID3, inhibitor of DNA binding 3, dominant negative helix-loop-helix protein; IL1B, interleukin 1, beta; ITGA9, integrin, alpha 9; ITGAL, integrin, alpha L (antigen CD11A (p180), lymphocyte function-associated antigen 1; alpha polypeptide); KALRN, kalirin, RhoGEF kinase; KLF2, Kruppel-like factor 2 (lung); LIFR, leukemia inhibitory factor receptor alpha; LMO1, LIM domain only 1 (rhombotin 1); LTB, lymphotoxin beta (TNF superfamily, member 3); MKL2, MKL/myocardin-like 2; NCOR1, nuclear receptor corepressor 1; NDRG1, N-myc downstream regulated 1; PECAM1, platelet/endothelial cell adhesion molecule 1; RASGRP1, RAS guanyl releasing protein 1 (calcium and DAG-regulated); Siglec5, sialic acid binding Ig-like lectin 5; SMAD6, SMAD family member 6; TCF7L2, transcription factor 7-like 2 (T-cell specific, HMG-box); TOP1, topoisomerase (DNA) I; TSPAN32, tetraspanin 32.

('PI3K', 'PDK1', 'increases_activity')
While strategies aimed at attenuating the PI3K signal have been mainly focused on inhibiting the PI3K catalytic subunits, there is currently growing evidence suggesting that PDK1 itself may be a viable target.
PDK1 is integral to the PI3K/AKT pathway, as it phosphorylates the activating segment of AKT, a potent proto-oncogene involved in a variety of cellular functions such as proliferation and survival.
Emerging evidence indicates that PDK1 plays a critical role in the context of PI3K activation.
Key issues that remain to be addressed before proceeding down the long road that leads to clinical testing include the advantage of PDK1 targeting over specific PI3K inhibition, and which particular clinical settings will benefit from specific PDK1 inhibition.
Accumulating evidence suggests that PDK1 plays a specific and distinct role from the canonical PI3K/Akt pathway, and that PDK1 may specifically activate signal propagation in tumor progression, as well as in cell migration and invasion.
Expressions of MEK, PDK1, PI3K, and EGFR in the two RCC lines were evaluated using Western blotting (
On the other hand, this drug did not inhibit the phosphorylation and expression of EGFR, MEK, PI3K and PDK1, and upstream receptors of Raf/MEK/ERK and PI3K/Akt/mTOR pathways.
Rather, Bisebromoamide would inhibit the activation of ERK and Akt, not MEK, PI3K, and PDK1.
The binding of PI3Ks and RTKs results in activation of Akt through PiP3 and PDK1, which affects multiple cellular processes including cell survival, proliferation, and motility [
Activated PI3K activates PDK1 which phosphorylates Akt, which transduces signals for cell survival, proliferation, motility, and angiogenesis as shown in 
PI3K: phosphoinositide 3-kinases; PDK1: phosphoinositide-dependent kinase-1; mTOR: mammalian target of rapamycin; TSC: tuberous sclerosis complex; AMPK: AMP-dependent protein kinase; ERK: extracellular signal-regulated kinase; PKC: protein kinase C.
IR could lead to several biochemical alterations, including inflammation and oxidant stress, which leads to the dysfunction of EPCs via the following two pathways: PI3K-PDK1-Akt and RAS-MAPK-p38 pathway [
The PI3K-dependent Akt serine/threonine phosphorylation by PDK1 and mTORC2 has long been thought to be the primary mechanism accounting for Akt activation.
Results showed that this bidirectional regulation of the activity of raft-associated Akt by aPPD was not due to changes in the activity of PI3K or PDK1 in the rafts (
Having discovered that selenite treatment inhibited Src/PI3K/PDK1/AKT signaling and activated FoxO proteins, we conducted a series of experiments to investigate the relationship between AKT and FoxO3a in selenite-induced apoptosis in CRC cells.
Selenite treatment inhibited Src/PI3K/PDK1/AKT pathway and accumulation of FoxO3a in the nucleus possibly through induced ROS in CRC cells.
Targeting the PI3K-mTOR pathway causes MYC activation through PDK1-dependent MYC phosphorylation and 
Molecules that maintain the survival of primordial follicles include PI3K, PDK1, mTORC1, S6K1, and rpS6.
RPTK, receptor protein tyrosine kinase; PTEN, phosphatase and tensin homolog; PIP2, phosphatidylinositol (4,5)-bisphosphate; PIP3, phosphatidylinositol (3,4,5)-triphosphate; PI3K, phosphatidylinositol 3-kinase; PDK1, 3-phosphoinositide-dependent protein kinase-1; Akt, protein kinase B; FOXO3a, forkhead box O3a; mTORC1,C2, mammalian target of rapamycin complex 1,2; TSC1/2, tuberin/tuberous sclerosis complex 1,2; S6K1, p70 ribosomal protein S6 kinase 1; rpS6, S6K1-ribosomal protein S6; p27, cyclin-dependent kinase inhibitor p27
Simplified pathway diagram showing EGFR signaling through the RAS/MEK/ERK and PI3K/PDK1/AKT pathways, illustrating the points of mutation/amplification in EGFR TKI resistance, along with other mechanisms.
SCF-receptor activation results in recruitment of PI3K to the receptor, which generates phosphorylates membrane lipids (PIP3) that form an anchor for the PH-domain containing kinases PDK1 and PKB.
PDK1-mediated activation of AKT, the key effector of class I PI3K signaling, results in modulation of distinct signaling cascades regulating cell proliferation (GSK3, FOXO), survival (BAD, MDM2) and protein synthesis/cell growth (TSC, RHEB, mTOR).
Andersen and colleagues have employed immunoaffinity precipitation followed by mass spectrometry of protein extracts from cells that were treated with inhibitors of PDK1, AKT or PI3K/mTOR [
Insulin has been shown to activate IR and stimulate PI3K/PDK1/AKT and GRB2/SOS/RAS kinase cascades, which are known to regulate mitochondrial function, as reviewed elsewhere [

('ETS2', 'ETS1', 'increases')
We compared the reliability and validity of two four-level emergency triage systems: the ETS1, used in our emergency department (ED); and the ETS2, a triage algorithm derived from the Emergency Severity Index [
Ten trained triage nurses were randomly assigned either to training in ETS2, or to refresh the ETS1.
A complete disagreement in UC was found in 3% and 5% cases of ETS1 and ETS2; a complete agreement in 52% and 56% cases of ETS1 and ETS2.
Hospital admission by ETS1 and ETS2 was similar for UC2 (39% vs 37%), UC3 (5% vs 8%), and UC4 (3% vs 0%); 100% of patients with UC1 in ETS1 and 60% in ETS2 were admitted to the ICU.

('DAG', 'PKC', 'increases_activity')
In a previous study we identified the pro-apoptotic genes PAWR (PKC apoptosis WT1 regulator; also named PAR-4, prostate apoptosis response-4) and PHLDA1 (pleckstrin homology-like domain, family A, member 1; also named TDAG51) as differentially expressed in breast tumors.
Protein kinase C (PKC) was originally discovered by Yasutomi Nishizuka in 1977 as a histone protein kinase activated by calcium and diacylglycerol (DAG), phospholipids and/or phorbol esters [
DAG is rapidly metabolized and thus activates PKC only transiently, while TPA persists much longer and results in prolonged activation of PKC [
The PKC activator DAG is also induces ROS in the skin, suggesting PKC may be necessary for TPA induction of oxidative stress [
High ambient glucose concentrations activate PKC by increasing the formation of diacylglycerol (DAG), the major endogenous cellular co-factor for PKC activation, from glycolytic intermediates such as dihydroxy-acetone phosphate and glyceraldehyde-3-phosphate.
The elevation of DAG and subsequent activation of PKC in the vasculature can be maintained chronically [
Oxidative stress may also be involved in the activation of DAG-PKC in vascular tissue [
Activation of the diacylglycerol (DAG)-protein kinase C (PKC) pathway has been implicated in the pathogenesis of a number of diabetic complications.
Diacylglycerol kinase (DGK) converts DAG to phosphatidic acid and acts as an endogenous regulator of PKC activity.
One of the best known functional roles of DGK is to regulate PKC activity through DAG metabolism [
WHO: World Health Organisation; ART: Assisted reproductive technology; HFEA: Human Fertilisation and Embryology Authority; IVF: In-vitro fertilisation; ICSI: Intracytoplasmic sperm injection; CG: Cortical granule; PN: Pro-nuclear; Ca2+: Calcium; IP3: Inositol trisphosphate; ER: Endoplasmic reticulum; PLC: Phospholipase C; PIP2: Phosphotidylinositol 4,5-bisphosphate; DAG: Diacylglycerol; PKC: Protein kinase C; PAWP: Post-acrosomal sheath WW domain-binding protein; NLS: Nuclear localisation signal; OAD: Oocyte activation deficiency; AOA: Artificial oocyte activation; MOAT: Mouse oocyte activation test; PIV: Particle image velocimetry.
Protein kinase D (PKD) constitutes a novel family of diacylglycerol (DAG)-responsive serine/threonine protein kinases with different structural, enzymological and regulatory properties from the protein kinase C (PKC) family members [
PKC binds DAG and PS via its N-terminal C1 domain.
The members of the canonical TRP receptor subfamily, TRPC3, TRPC6, and TRPC7, are activated by the permeant diacyl glycerol (DAG) analogue, 1-oleoyl-2-acetyl-sn-glycerol (OAG) and this activation is reversed by the PKC activator 12-myristate 13-acetate (PMA) [
2-AG (2-arachidonoylglycerol), AA (arachidonic acid), AEA (anandamide), CB1 (cannabinoid receptor type I), CB2 (cannabinoid receptor type I), DAG (diacylglycerol), FAAH (fatty acid amide hydrolase), GPCR (G protein-coupled receptor), HpETEs (hydroperoxyeicosatetraenoic acids), LO (lipoxygenase), NADA (N-arachidonoyl dopamine), NAPE (N-acylphosphatidylethanolamine), NAPE-PLD (NAPE-specific phospholipase D), PIP2 (phosphatidylinositol 4,5-bisphosphate), PKC (protein kinase C), PLA2 (phospholipase A2), PLC (phospholipase C).
DAG: diacylglicerol; fMLP: N-formyl-L-methionyl-L-leucyl-L-phenylalanine; GRK: G-coupled receptor kinase; HEPES: 4-(2-hydroxyethyl)-1-piperazineethanesulfonic acid; HMC-1: human mast cell line-1; LAMP-3: lysosome associated membrane protein-3; MFI: Mean of fluorescence intensity; PI3K: phosphoinositide-3 kinase; PKC: protein kinase C; PLC: phospholypase C; PMA: phorbol-12-myristate-13-acetate; p38MAPK: p38-mitogen activated protein kinase; PtdIns3,4,5-P
Experimental studies have shown that protein kinase C (PKC) activity and levels of diacylglycerol (DAG), an activator of PKC, are increased following exposure of vascular tissues to elevated glucose (
At the same time, DAG activates novel Protein Kinase Cs (nPKCs) the main upstream activators of PKD.
DAG, diacylglycerol; ERK, extracellular signal regulated kinase; GRB, growth factor receptor binding protein; MAPK, mitogen-activated protein kinase; MEK, mitogen-activated protein kinase kinase; PAMP, pathogen-associated molecular pattern; PI3K, phosphatidylinositol 3-kinase; PKC, protein kinase C; PLC, phospholipase C; SOS, son of sevenless; TLR, Toll-like receptor; TREM, triggering receptor expressed on myeloid cells; TREM-1L, TREM-1 ligand.
ACTH = adrenocorticotropic hormone; DAG = diacylglycerol; DDAVP = 1-deamino-8-D-arginine vasopressin; GPCR = G-protein-coupled receptor; GRK = G protein-coupled receptor kinase; OTR = oxytocin receptor; PKC = protein kinase C; P
AC, adenylyl cyclase; AR, adrenoceptor; DAG, diacylglycerol; IP3, inositol-tris-phosphate; MLC, myosin light chain; PKA, protein kinase A; PKC, protein kinase C; PLC, phospholipase C; PLD, phospholipase D; SR, sarcoplasmic reticulum.

('HNF4A', 'FOXA1', 'increases')
We determined the genome-wide binding in livers of five mouse species and rat for CEBPA, HNF4A, and FOXA1 by performing chromatin immunoprecipitation (ChIP) experiments coupled to high-throughput sequencing in biological duplicates (
We first assessed how rapidly TF binding differences accumulate among these five mouse genomes by determining the proportion of HNF4A, CEBPA, and FOXA1 TFBRs that reciprocally overlap between species in a qualitative manner; that is, how often TF binding in one species was evaluated as not identified in the homologous position in a second mouse species when comparing present-absent binding calls.
Because few differences in TF binding between mouse species could be connected to specific SNVs in the motif, we explored whether the extent of combinatorial binding among CEBPA, FOXA1, and HNF4A could help to explain these differences.
We then categorized the remaining regions with overlapping binding of HNF4A, CEBPA, and/or FOXA1 as clusters of TF cobinding.
To elucidate the first steps of TF binding evolution and the underlying mechanisms in mammals, we characterized the binding profiles of three tissue-specific TFs, CEBPA, HNF4A, and FOXA1, in livers from six inbred rodents.
(A) Livers from a genetically engineered CEBPA KO mice were obtained, and ChIP experiments were performed against HNF4A and FOXA1 to evaluate the impact of CEBPA deletion on cobound TFs located in clusters ([HNF4A (H, blue), FOXA1 (F, green), and CEBPA (C, red)] and CTCF [a noninteracting partner, as a control]).
(B) The effect of knocking out CEBPA and HNF4A was evaluated for the following cluster classes: 2TF clusters containing HNF4A and FOXA1 (HF), CEBPA and FOXA1 (CF), and CEBPA and HNF4A (CH) and finally, all three TFs (CHF).
(A) ChIP followed by high-throughput sequencing (ChIP-seq) of CEBPA, HNF4A and FOXA1 in C57BL/6J, A/J, CAST/EiJ, SPRET/EiJ, and Caroli/EiJ mice showing their phylogenetic relationship and H&E stained livers for each species.
(C) Summary table of genomic background (Input) and ChIP-seq data sets for CEBPA, HNF4A and FOXA1 duplicate in C57BL/6J, A/J, CAST/EiJ, SPRET/EiJ, and Caroli/EiJ, and rat included in the subsequent analysis.
(F) The correspondence of TFBR intensities between individuals is shown quantitatively by correlating two Inter-pools, each containing two biological replicates of SPRET/EiJ (for CEBPA, HNF4A) or C57BL/6J (for FOXA1), showing high correlation coefficients when we consider all TF binding regions (R
(D) For CEBPA, FOXA1, and HNF4A, TF binding sites that had a SNV in the directly bound motif were collected.
(E) The difference in TF binding intensity is correlated with the change in information content of the TF binding motif of CEBPA, HNF4A and FOXA1.
Within singletons, the proportion of free-standing CEBPA, HNF4A, and FOXA1 is shown by color as an inset (right side of each white bar).
Within the 2TF clusters (multicolored, right outset is the total numbers of TFBR), the 2TF clusters containing FOXA1 and HNF4A (F+H, blue) are more often found than the combinations of the other two TFs (F+C, yellow; C+H, purple).
(B) The distribution of binding intensities for each TF category in C57BL/6J are shown, color-coded (blue is HNF4A, green is FOXA1, red is CEBPA).
We tested if these regions are more likely to be lost in CEBPA KO mouse liver, when compared to control regions where cluster disappearance is associated with changes in the HNF4A motif (1,882) or the FOXA1 (1,390) motif.
We tested if these regions are more likely to be lost in HNF4A KO mouse liver, when compared to control regions where cluster disappearance can be linked to changes in the CEBPA (1,173) motif or the FOXA1 (1,390) motif.

('LMO2', 'GATA1', 'increases')
Notably, none of the examined tissue-specific GATA1 co-factors (FOG1, SCL/TAL1, Ldb1 and LMO2) were found on mitotic chromosomes, regardless of whether GATA1 was retained at these sites.
In erythroid cells, LMO2 associates with corepressors mSIN3A and ETO2 only when in a complex with SCL:E47; therefore, not through GATA1.
The hinge movement is differentially required for the LMO2 interactions with SCL:E47 and GATA1 or for its SCL-independent interaction with P300/PCAF and LSD1.
Building a Network of Interactions between SCL:E47:LMO2:LDB1 and GATA1, Corepressors, Coactivators, and Chromatin-Remodeling Proteins

('PI3K', 'FAK', 'adds_modification')
Integrins appear to activate a focal adhesion kinase (FAK)/ phosphoinositide 3-kinase (PI3K)/AKT pathway [
The clustering of activated integrins triggers signaling cascades involving FAK, Src, PI3K, RhoA, Rho kinase (ROCK), and myosin regulatory light chain (MLCK) phosphorylation, culminating in actinomyosin-mediated cell contractility, which transmits forces that alter the ECM.
Recent data in murine macrophages demonstrated a CD11b/CD18-dependent expression of pro-inflammatory cytokines via activation of FAK/PI3K/Akt/NF-kappaB signaling pathways [
CTGF was previously reported to block FAK/PI3K/AKT or miR-504/FOXP1 signaling suppressing cell motility and invasion in oral squamous cell carcinoma.
To determine if targeting the signaling cascades in the regulation of the actin cytoskeleton pathway would overcome resistance to HDACi, inhibitors to the MAPK, FAK and PI3K pathways were evaluated in combination with LBH589 against HMCL, OCI-MY1, RPMI-8266, OPM2 and U266.
It should also be noted that within the two HDACi-resistant HMCL, although both cell lines were sensitive to HDACi and MEKi combination, OPM2 was more sensitive to HDACi and FAKi and PI3K combinations.
The formation of podosomes on fluid surfaces is mediated by local activation of phosphoinositide 3-kinase (PI3K) and the production of phosphatidylinositol-(3,4,5)-triphosphate (PIP3) in a FAK/PYK2-dependent manner.
FAK activates the important PI3K/Akt survival pathway.
Metastatic tumour cells evade anoikis by intrinsically activated survival pathways via for example PI3K or Akt signalling, independent of extrinsic Integrin and FAK signalling [

('BRAF', 'MEK2', 'adds_modification')
Children with germ-line mutations in KRAS, BRAF, MEK1 and MEK2 develop Cardio-facio-cutaneous syndrome (CFC), characterized by abnormal heart, craniofacial, and skin development.
Trametinib, an allosteric inhibitor of MEK1 and MEK2, has recently been shown to improve OS when compared to cytotoxic chemotherapy in BRAF mutated melanoma, though response rates are lower than those observed with the single agent vemurafenib.

('FAK', 'SOS', 'binds')
This takes place either through activation of Ras, recruiting the adaptor protein Grb2 and the Ras guanine nucleotide exchange factor SOS to phospho-FAK at the plasma membrane, or through Src-dependent phosphorylation of p130Cas.

('MYC', 'LEF1', 'increases')
Application of the framework to study the differences between gastrointestinal stromal tumor (GIST) and leiomyosarcoma (LMS) resulted in the identification of nine transcription factors (SRF, NKX2-5, CCDC6, LEF1, VDR, ZNF250, TRIM63, MAF, and MYC).

('GATA3', 'FOXA1', 'increases')
Because no significant difference in FOXA1 and GATA3 mRNA expression was observed in the ER-positive group, we decided to explore a more specific breast cancer subtype.
FOXA1 and GATA3 proteins are expressed in ER-positive luminal breast cancers (Sorlie et al. 
In breast carcinoma cell lines, the complex created by FOXA1, GATA3, and ER regulates estrogen (

('TCF4', 'LEF1', 'increases')
(D) miR-135b expression following silencing of TCF4 and LEF1 transcription in 
Furthermore, LEF1 as well as TCF1 and TCF4 repressed Runx2 activity on the osteocalcin promoter [
Samples with nuclear LEF1 as well as high TCF4 (++++) expression were associated with a shorter survival (
Recent in vivo experiments in a xenograft brain lung metastasis model postulated a functional role for lymphoid enhancer factor 1/T cell factor 4 (LEF1/TCF4) in a subgroup of adenocarcinomas [
Genes were assigned to the LEF1/TCF4 or AXIN2 gene list according to their mean negative and positive correlations (
Two groups of patients were defined by clustering the gene expression profiles of the LEF1/TCF4 gene signature with significantly different survival (
Pathway analyses of the two LEF1/TCF4 clusters in primary lung adenocarcinomas
An essential function of the transcription factors LEF1/TCF4 in cerebral metastases of lung adenocarcinomas has been described in mouse models [
First of all, our data strongly support a role of LEF1/TCF4 in at least one subgroup of cerebrally metastasized adenocarcinoma patients.
This subgroup is characterized by a poor prognosis, in particular regarding both nuclear LEF1 and high TCF4 positive (4+) patients.
Additionally, we revealed the prognostic relevance of a LEF1/TCF4 signature in primary lung adenocarcinomas in a microarray dataset of primary lung adenocarcinomas.
However, this does not exclude any direct activation or modification of LEF1/TCF4 by WNT signaling.
In conclusion, this retrospective study underlines the previous results obtained in a mouse model concerning a role of LEF1/TCF4 in brain metastasis of lung adenocarcinoma.
However, further studies are needed to highlight the significance of our findings and to specify which signaling pathways are involved in the LEF1/TCF4 function.

('PI3K', 'AKT1', 'adds_modification')
When ChEMBL is selected as the interaction database, the MI Overlay displays small molecules from ChEMBL as interactors of AKT1 E17K variant protein of the PI3K/AKT Signaling in Cancer pathway.

('PAX2', 'FOXA1', 'increases')
HER2 signaling has also connection with the ER-cooperating factors FOXA1, PAX2, and AIB-1.

('JUN', 'RUNX1', 'increases')
RUNX1 siRNA experiments that reduce expression of SPI-1, MEF2D, JUND, and JUNB (

('SHC', 'GRB2', 'binds')
Using the previously curated human EGFR pathway, which included a number of annotations for EGFR and downstream signaling by SHC1, GRB2, PLCG1 and CBL, as a template from which to extend the EGFR pathway, we imported this dataset into the Reactome Curator Tool [

('RUNX1', 'RUNX2', 'increases')
The mammalian RUNX family of nuclear hetero-dimeric transcription factors includes three members, Runt-related transcription factor 1 (RUNX1), RUNX2 and RUNX3, which have pivotal roles in the regulation of normal development and tumorigenesis.
The RUNX (Runt-related transcription factor) family consists of three members, RUNX1, RUNX2 and RUNX3.
RUNX1 and RUNX2 were essential for hematopoiesis and osteogenesis, respectively.

('Raf-1', 'MEK', 'adds_modification')
The NCFC syndromes comprise neurofibromatosis (NF) and the Noonan (NS), Costello (CS), LEOPARD (LS) and cardio-facious-cutaneous (CFC) syndromes, which are correlated with autosomal-dominant germ-line mutations within either the core components (Ras, B-Raf, Raf-1, MEK) or modulators of the Ras/ERK pathway (NF1, SHP2, SOS and Spred).
It has been shown that Raf-1 promotes cell survival in a MEK/ERK-independent manner via antagonizing apoptosis signal-regulating kinase-1 (ASK-1) [
Raf-1 dependent phosphotransferase activity is measured in a kinase reaction using recombinant MEK1 unactive as a Raf-1 substrate over PC12 lysates where Raf-1 was immunoprecipitated using anti-Raf-1 antibody (Santa Cruz, Biotechnology).
Activated Raf-1 was localized on early mitotic kinetochores, activation of the MAP kinase cascade mimicked effects of RKIP depletion, and inhibition of ERK1,2 signaling by either drugs, dominant-negative MEK, or siRNA for Raf-1 rescued defects caused by RKIP loss.

('AR', 'FOXA1', 'increases')
FOXA1 is essential for androgen-stimulated binding of AR to the target genes
[
The pioneer factor FOXA1 also plays an important role in androgen receptor (AR) signaling of molecular apocrine tumors, which have been recently identified as an additional subgroup of ER-negative and AR-positive breast tumors (Ni et al. 

('PI3K', 'BTK', 'translocates')
While AKT is the PI3K effector that is most widely implicated in cancer, there are several AKT-independent pathways activated by PI3K, which notably include BTK (
In addition, small-molecule inhibitors of PI3K and BTK, including GS-101 and ibrutinib, respectively, have demonstrated remarkable results in relapsed/refractory CLL and MCL, and are anticipated to gain FDA approval within the next year.
Targeting the PI3K and BTK pathways in NHL.
First studies using the BTK inhibitor Ibrutinib or the PI3K/mTOR inhibitor Bez235 showed promising effects.
On activation of BCR signaling, subsequent BTK and PI3K activations occur which consequently manifest in upregulation of CLL-specific chemokines, such as CCL3 and CCL4, which activate T cells, generating survival signals via CD40/CD40L interactions.

('E2F1', 'MYC', 'increases')
Overall and globally, the patients are divided into two major groups: the MYC group
that also includes the RUNX1, E2F1 transcription factors, and the second group, which
includes Suz12 and P53 as key enriched transcription factors.
In addition to E2F1 and EF4 proteins, a higher level of MYC and MAX response protein was found HPV-positive OPC.
In fact they have been conducted on a limited number of samples and the predictive power of changes of factors such as MYC/MAX or E2F1, an alteration of this transcript profile, has not yet been established.
Interestingly, similar to PDCD4-mediated pathways, miR-184 mimics suppressed the expression of pRB, C-MYC, CCND1 and E2F1 (
We found that PDCD4-mediated growth suppression attributed to cell cycle transition obstacle by repressing the expression of cell cycle factors, including C-MYC, CCND1, pRb and E2F1, and transcription factor C-Jun, and the elevation of cell apoptosis level by inducing the cleavage of CASP9, 3, 6, 7 and PARP.
Four transcription factors (HIC1, p53, E2F1, and cMYC) have been identified to modulate SIRT1 expression under oxidative stress/DNA-damage conditions and/or nutrient deprivation.
As a demonstration of the possibility and the effectiveness of miRNA based fuzzy mechanism, a fuzzy cognitive map -a mathematical formalism combining neural network and fuzzy logic- has been developed to study the apoptosis/proliferation control performed by the miRNA-17-92 cluster/E2F1/cMYC circuitry.
As a demonstrative case of application of FCM to miRNA regulation, we selected the well studied miRNA-17-92 (miR-17-92)/E2F1/cMYC circuitry (Fig. 
Independently of the initial values chosen for the 6 nodes of the map, the cellular behaviour node indicated a normal cell cycle condition, with mild over-expression of cMYC and miR-17-92 (cell behaviour=0.41, cMYC=0.65, miR-17-92=0.72, E2F1=0.52, E2F2=0.52, E2F3=0.52).
Independently from the initial values chosen for the 6 FCM nodes, the cell behaviour node indicated a normal cell cycle condition (0.41) and
a mild over expression of cMYC (0.65), miR-17-92 (0.72), E2F1 (0.52), E2F2 (0.52) and E2F3 (0.52).

('GATA6', 'GATA1', 'increases')
The evolutionary conserved GATA family of tissue- and organ-specific vertebrate transcription factors (GATA-binding proteins 1 to 6; GATA1 to GATA6) consists of two zinc finger domains.

('YY1', 'SRF', 'increases')
The C-terminal Zinc-Finger domain of GATA-4 is known to interact with various transcriptional activators such as GATA-6, MEF-2, NFAT, Nkx-2.5, SRF, dHAND and YY1 [

('MEK', 'ERK', 'adds_modification')
In the MM, by simply altering the rate equation for Raf-catalyzed phosphorylation of MEK in a manner consistent with competitive inhibition, and likewise for the receptor inhibitor, the MM predicts a modest 58% decrease in ERK* (
Dysregulated signaling through the RAS/RAF/mitogen-activated protein kinase (MEK)/extracellular signal-regulated kinase (ERK) signaling pathway due to mutations in K-Ras and B-Raf are common events in CRC.
Disturbances in the RAS/RAF/MEK/ERK signaling pathway are the most frequent and perhaps the most important observed defects, with activating mutations in the 
However, under these treatment conditions MEK1/2 phosphorylation declined while ERK1/2 activity was rising arguing that camptothecin effects on the ERK1/2 pathway are more complicated than just altered MKP-1 expression.
It is historically well known that signaling by the PI3K-AKT and MEK1/2-ERK1/2 pathways in a cell type-dependent fashion can collaborate to maintain cell viability.
Inhibition of MEK1/2 or knockdown of ERK2 blocked sustained AKT activity in cells treated with a PI3K/mTOR inhibitor.
Another likely advantage of direct RAS effector interaction site targeted drugs would be that they would also be expected to inhibit other RAS effector pathways such as RAF/MEK/ERK, which are activated from the same region of RAS.
Aberrant activation of Wnt, MEK/ERK, and Notch signaling pathways is known to contribute to the pathogenesis of myeloid leukemias and acute T-cell lymphoblastic leukemias and lymphomas [
Our E2-enhanced cell expansion model was characterized by the early activation of genes belonging to the MEK/ERK survival pathway and a remarkable regulation of multiple cancer-associated genes.
MPNST: malignant peripheral nerve sheath tumor; NF1: neurofibromatosis type 1; FAP: familial adenomatous polyposis; NSAID: nonsteroidal anti-inflammatory drug; COX: cyclooxigenase; PDE: phosphodiesterase; PKG: proteinkinase G; JNK: C-jun N-terminal protein kinase; MEKK: mitogen activated protein kinase kinase kinase; PARP: poly (ADP-ribose) polymerase; phospho-ERK1/2: phosphorylated extracellular signal-regulated kinase 1 and 2; NIH: national institute of health; DMEM: Dulbecco's modified eagle medium; FBS: fetal bovine serum; DMSO: dimethyl sulfoxide; BrdU: 5-Bromo-2'deoxyuridine; bFGF: basic fibroblastic growth factor; PBS: phosphate buffered saline; XTT: sodium 3'-[1-(phenylaminocarbonyl)-3,4-tetrazolium]-bis(4-methoxy-6-nitro)benzene sulfonic acid hydrate); TUNEL: terminal deoxynucleotidyltransferase dUTP nick end labelling; PI: propidium iodide; TBS: Tris-buffered normal saline; EGF: epidermal growth factor; DTT: dithiothreitol; PMSF: phenylmethylsulfonyl fluoride; DHA; docosahexaenoic acid; SAPK: stress-activated protein kinase; h: hours.
p27: p27Kip1; p21: p21Cip1/Waf1; AMPK: 5'-AMP-activated protein kinase; TSC: tuberous sclerosis complex; mTOR: mammalian target of rapamycin; RTK: receptor tyrosine kinase; PTEN: phosphatase and tensin homolog; PI3K: phosphoinositide 3-kinase; PKB: protein kinase B; MAPK: mitogen-activated protein kinase; MEK: mitogen-activated protein (MAP) kinase kinase; ERK: ERK MAP kinase; MNK: MAP kinase interacting kinase; m
uPAR-induced resistance to anoikis in the nontransformed retinal epithelial cells resulted from uPA binding and activation of MEK/ERK and PI3K/Akt pathways.
Nonstandard abbreviations: p27, p27Kip1; p21, p21Cip1/Waf1; AMPK, 5'-AMP-activated protein kinase; TSC, tuberous sclerosis complex; mTOR, mammalian target of rapamycin; RPTK, receptor protein tyrosine kinase; PI3K, phosphoinositide 3-kinase; PDK, phosphoinositide-dependent kinase; PKB, protein kinase B; MAPK, mitogen-activated protein kinase; MEK, mitogen-activated protein (MAP) kinase kinase; ERK, ERK MAP kinase; MNK, MAP kinase interacting kinase; m
RAS is a small GTP-binding protein tethered to the inner cell membrane that couples growth factor receptor activation to the downstream RAF-MEK-ERK MAPK cascade (Figure 
APC: adenomatous polyposis coli; BADJ: bronchio-alveolar duct junction; BASC: bronchio-alveolar stem cell; CC: Clara cell; c-Myc: cellular Myelocytomatosis; EGFR: epidermal growth factor receptor; ERK: extracellular signal-regulated kinase; HGF: hepatocyte growth factor; LEF: lymphoid enhancer factor; MAPK: mitogen-activated protein kinase; MEK: MAP kinase extracellular signal-regulated kinase; NSCLC: non-small-cell lung cancer; PCR: polymerase chain reaction; PI3K: phosphoinositide-3-kinase; RT-PCR: reverse transcription- polymerase chain reaction; rtTA: reverse transcriptional transactivator; SCID: severe combined immune deficiency; SP-C: surfactant protein-C; Sca1: stem cell antigen 1; TCF: T-cell factor; VEGF: vascular endothelial growth factor; Wnt: wingless/int.
To confirm the conclusion that in PC-3 cells the MEK/ERK 1/2 pathway is down-regulated, levels of ERK 1/2 phosphorylation in DU-145 and PC-3 cells were measured using a cell-based ELISA assay.
EGF increased the mRNA expression of RAF1, MEK, ERK and MAPK14 significantly in HepG2 cells (Figure 
MEK inhibitors U0126 and AZD6244 deactivated phosphorylated ERK, decreased endogenous MRP1 expression, reversed gemcitabine or doxorubicin induced MRP1 and MRP3 upregulation, and increased the intracellular doxorubicin accumulation.
Western blot analysis revealed that MEK inhibitors U0126 and AZD6244 modulated the MAPK pathway by increasing the p-MEK levels and decreasing the p-ERK levels.
The antibodies for western blot were purchased from: Actin (A1978) (Sigma Aldrich, Steinheim, Germany); p-ERK (#4377), p-MEK (#9121), MEK (#4694), p-Raf1 (#9427), and Raf1 (#9422) (Cell Signaling, Frankfurt, Germany); MRP3 (sc-20767), ERK (sc-135900), and the secondary antibodies goat anti rabbit (sc-2004) as well as goat anti mouse (sc-2005) (Santa Cruz, Heidelberg, Germany); MRP1 (ab32574) (Abcam, Cambridge, UK).
ABC protein: ATP binding cassette proteins; EGFR: Epidermal growth factor receptor; ERK: Mitogen-activated protein kinase; MAPK: Mitogen activated protein kinase; MEK: Mitogen-activated protein kinase kinase; MRP1: Multidrug resistance-associated protein 1; MRP3: Multidrug resistance-associated protein 3; PDGFR: Platelet-derived growth factor receptor; PGP: P-glycoprotein; Raf: Proto-oncogene serine/threonine-protein kinase; siRNA: Small interfering RNA; VEGFR: Vascular endothelial growth factor receptor.
Conversely, knockdown of Mirk/Dyrk1B by siRNA led to up-regulated activation of c-Raf-MEK-ERK1/2 pathway and subsequent changes in cell cycle proteins (cyclin D1, p27kip1), accompanied by increased growth rate and cells from G0/G1 into S of cell cycle which could be blocked by U0126 in a dose-dependent manner, indicating Mirk/Dyrk1B may sequester MAPK/ERK pathway, and vice versa.
As well as Mirk/Dyrk1B regulating cell cycle-related proteins cyclin D1 and p27kip1, it has been demonstrated that blocking mitogenic-activated protein kinase kinae (MEK) - extracellular signal-regulated kinase (ERK) signaling pathway increases Mirk abundance by up-regulating Mirk/Dyrk1B transcription in either myoblast or colon cancer cells [
The data suggested that CCN1 is a tumor promoter in AML that acts through the MEK/ERK pathway to up-regulate c-Myc and Bcl-xL and to down-regulate Bax.
We demonstrated that CCN1 influences the MEK/ERK pathway in AML cells, potentially regulating c-Myc, Bcl-xL and Bax.
These findings suggest that CCN1 is elevated in AML and promotes survival through the MEK/ERK pathway by up-regulating c-Myc and Bcl-xL and by down-regulating Bax.
The Ras/Raf/mitogen-activated protein kinase (MEK)/extracellular signal-regulated kinase (ERK) pathway (Ras-Raf-MEK-ERK pathway) is an intracellular key signaling pathway that transmits mitogenic stimuli from the extracellular environment to the nucleus of the cell by multiple phosphorylation steps [
Total and phosphorylated ERK1/2 and MEK were assessed.
To down-regulate the ERK1/2 signaling pathway, cells were treated with the kinase inhibitor U0126, which is specific for MEK1/2, an upstream kinase in the ERK cascade (
Abbreviations: EGFR, epidermal growth factor receptor; ERK, extracellular signal-regulated kinase; IGF1R, insulin-like growth factor 1 receptor; MEK, MAPK/extracellular signal-regulated kinase kinase; mTOR, mammalian target of rapamycin; PI3K, phosphatidylinositol 3-kinase; PKB, protein kinase B; VEGF(R), vascular endothelial growth factor (receptor).
BRAF is an integral part of the RAS-RAF-MEK-ERK (mitogen-activated protein kinase) signal transduction pathway, a protein kinase cascade which regulates cellular growth, proliferation, differentiation, and survival in response to extracellular signals, including growth factors, cytokines, and hormones.
Regorafenib is an oral multi kinase inhibitor targeting both tumor cell proliferation/survival pathways (RAF/MEK/ERK) and selected RTKs such as VEGFR-2/3, TIE-2, PDGFR, RET, and c-KIT (
Furthermore, the level of activated pERK1/2, detected by immunohistochemistry, was strongly reduced in treated mice, indicating that, in vivo, regorafenib effectively inhibited the RAF/MEK/ERK signaling cascade.
Regorafenib also inhibits oncogenesis, in part, by selectively targeting the intracellular kinases BRAF and RAF1, an activator of downstream mitogen-activated protein kinases (MEK and ERK) that promote cell proliferation.
Brain metastases are the most common cause of death in patients with metastatic melanoma, and the RAF-MEK-ERK and PI3K-AKT signaling pathways are key players in melanoma progression and drug resistance.
As the RAF-MEK-ERK and PI3K-AKT signaling pathways are thought to be key players in melanoma progression and drug resistance, we performed immunohistochemical analyses of cerebral metastases and of matched extracerebral metastases from the same patients.
In addition, we showed that this compound suppressed cell proliferation in both cell lines by inhibiting the PI3K/Akt/mTOR pathway as well as the Raf/MEK/ERK pathway.
On the other hand, this drug did not inhibit the phosphorylation and expression of EGFR, MEK, PI3K and PDK1, and upstream receptors of Raf/MEK/ERK and PI3K/Akt/mTOR pathways.
Rather, Bisebromoamide would inhibit the activation of ERK and Akt, not MEK, PI3K, and PDK1.
The Raf/MEK/ERK signal transduction pathway is present in all eukaryotic cells.
This pivotal pathway relays extracellular signals to the nucleus via a cascade of specific phosphorylation events involving Raf, MEK, and ERK to regulate fundamental cellular processes, including proliferation, differentiation, and cell survival [
Effective inhibitors specific for many of the key components of the Raf/MEK/ERK or PI3K/Akt/mTOR pathway have been developed.
Our findings have important implications for metastatic RCC therapy because they provide a rationale for dual inhibition of the Raf/MEK/ERK and PI3K/Akt/mTOR pathways.
Previous reports indicated the efficacy of combining Raf/MEK/ERK inhibitors with PI3K/Akt/mTOR inhibitors.
Further experiments demonstrated that overexpression of ANO1 in T24 and UM-SCC1 cancer cells induced RAS-RAF-MEK-ERK pathway activation 
Pharmacologic inhibition of MEK/ERK (using specific inhibitors for MAPK/ERK signaling pathway, UO126 and AZD6244) and genetic inactivation of ERK1/2 (using siRNA and dominant-negative constructs) abrogated the growth effect of ANO1, indicating a role for MAPK activation to enhance the ANO1-mediated proliferation.
Through serine/threonine phosphorylation, Raf activates a family of dual specificity kinases known as MAPK kinases (MAP2K) or MAPK/ERK kinases (MEKs).
Presumably, the epigenetic changes might comprise pathways involved in chromatin remodelling and/or the Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK pathway.
However, other signals impinge on mTORC1, including the Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK1/2/p90
An inhibitor to MEK or curcumin significantly suppressed the phosphorylation of ERK1/2 and expression of VEGF.
An inhibitor to MEK1/2 inhibitor (U0126) and antibodies to phospho-ERK and ERK were purchased from Cell Signaling Technology, Inc. (Danvers, MA, USA).
Raf activates MEK which in turn phosphorylates and activates ERK1/2 [
The RAS-RAF-MEK-ERK-MAP kinase pathway is an important cellular signal transduction pathway which mediates cellular responses to growth signals.
Mutations in both KRAS and BRAF stimulate the MEK-ERK-MAP kinase cascade pathway [
Most B-Raf mutations involve the V600E amino acid substitution, resulting in constitutive activation of the MEK-ERK signaling pathway.
HB-EGF transactivates epidermal growth factor receptors (EGFR) resulting in intracellular signaling via both the MEK/ERK and PI3K/AKT signaling pathways.
Zoledronic acid enhances fluvastatin and paclitaxel activity against T24 in a synergistic manner and this is mediated largely by inhibition of both the Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK and PI3K/AKT signaling pathways via isoprenylation inhibition.
The effects of the fluvastatin and zoledronic acid on signal transduction pathways of Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK and PI3K /AKT were investigated under the same conditions as above.
The prototype member of the MEK kinase family, designated MAP kinase kinase (MKK-1)/or MEK-1, specifically phosphorylates the MAP kinase regulatory threonine and tyrosine residues present in the Thr-Glu-Tyr motif of ERK 1/2 [
It promotes proliferation and cell survival through activation of MEK/ERK and P13-k/Akt signaling cascades in the cell [
Several signal pathways related to survival of cancer cells are frequently deregulated in melanoma (RAS-RAF-MEK-ERK pathway, p16INK4A-CDK4-RB pathway, ARF-p53 pathway, PI3K-AKT pathway and the canonical Wnt signaling pathway).
One such pathway is the MAPK/ ERK pathway: Treatment of cells with the MEK1 inhibitor PD98059, or expression of mutants of RAS, which is upstream of MAPK/ ERK, can prevent EMT [
Oxidative stress can activate the ERK/MEK and the PI3K/AKT pathways.
HspB1 and HspB5 have been reported to stimulate constitutive cell division by interacting with different cytoplasmic receptors, such as VEGF, FGF-2 and Her2, leading to an enhanced activity of the MAPK kinase/MEK/ERK pathway.
Abbreviations are the following: CD10: 100 kDa transmembrane metallo-endopeptidase; CD14: cluster of differentiation 14; TLR1: Toll-like receptor 1; TLR2: Toll-like receptor 2; TLR3: Toll-like receptor 3; NGF-beta: Nerve growth factor beta; Her2: Human Epidermal Growth Factor Receptor-2; ERbeta: Estrogen receptor beta; FGF-2: Fibroblast growth factor 2; VEGF: vascular endothelial growth factor; IKKbeta: inhibitor of nuclear factor kappa-B kinase subunit beta; DAXX: death domain-associated protein 6; PKC delta: protein kinase C delta; RhoA: Ras homolog gene family member A; PKCalpha: protein kinase C alpha; Akt: protein kinase B; P38: P38 mitogen-activated protein kinases; MK2: Mitogen-activated protein kinase-activated protein kinase 2 (MAPKAPK2); Phk: Phosphorylase kinase (PhK); PTEN: phosphatase and TENsin homolog; PRKD1: Serine/threonine-protein kinase D1; PPM1A: protein phosphatase 1A (formerly 2C), magnesium-dependent, alpha isoform; TRAF6: tumor necrosis factor receptor-associated factor 6; Raf, MEK, ERK: Mitogen activated protein (MAP) kinase pathways; Bax: Bcl-2 associated X protein; PEA-15: astrocytic phosphoprotein PEA-15; XIAP: X-linked inhibitor of apoptosis; p66Shc: 66 kDa isoform of ShcA (Src homology 2 domain containing transforming protein 2); G6PD: glucose 6-phosphate dehydrogenase; HDM2: Human double minute 2 homolog; IF: intermediate filaments; MAPs: microtubule-associated proteins; GFAP: Glial fibrillary acidic protein; GRIFIN: galectin-related interfiber protein; HDAC6: histone deacetylase 6; STAT2 and 3: signal transducer and activator of transcription 2 and 3; HSF-1: heat shock factor 1; GATA-1: globin transcription factor 1; Snail: zinc finger protein that binds and inhibits E-cadherin promoter to induce epithelial mesenchymal transformation; eIF4E: eukaryotic translation initiation factor 4E; eIF4G: eukaryotic translation initiation factor 4G; AUF1: AU-rich element (ARE)-binding protein; p90 ribosomal S6 kinase; Smad-Smurf2: Smad ubiquitination regulatory factor 2; p27kip1: cyclin-dependent kinase inhibitor p27kip1; Fbx4: Fbox only protein 4.
For example, they can promote constitutive cell division by interacting with cytoplasmic receptors (VEGF, FGF-2, Her2) leading to enhanced activity of MAPK kinase/MEK/ERK pathway.
Activation of the Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK pathway induces RET downregulation, growth inhibition, and differentiation in MTC cells by inducing expression and secretion of LIF, which activates STAT3 in an autocrine/paracrine mode.
Cleaved caspase 3, cleaved caspase 8, cleaved caspase 9 (Asp330), caspase 8, caspase 9,
phospho-p44/42 MEK (Thr202/Tyr204) (phospho-ERK1/2), total AKT, phospho-p90RSK (rabbit
polyclonals; Cell Signaling), anti-Akt/PKB[pS
The inhibition of ERK1/2 phosphorylation and function by EGFR and MEK
antagonists.
This is not surprising as EGFR has been reported to enhance ERK phosphorylation
downstream of MEK through dual-specificity phosphatases (
Both PI3K-Akt and MEK/ERK signalling pathways are important for cytokine induction by palmitate.
MEK/ERK signalling is necessary for synergistic induction of IL-6 by palmitate and insulin.
Insulin binding to the insulin receptor engages two primary signal transduction pathways, the mitogen activated protein kinase (MAPK)/extracellular regulated kinase (ERK) kinase (MEK) - ERK pathway and phosphatidylinositide 3-kinase (PI3K) - Akt pathway, in insulin responsive cells [
These changes were reversed by tiron (ROS scavenger), PD98059 (MEK/ERK inhibitor), or siRNA of GATA-4.
Hyperglycemia can cause systolic dysfunction and a higher expression of cTnI in cardiomyocytes through ROS, enhancing MEK/ERK-induced GATA-4 phosphorylation and accumulation in the cell nucleus.
The transcriptional activity of GATA-4 could be enhanced via a p38 and MEK/ERK MAPK-dependent pathway to phosphorylate GATA-4 activation domains and GATA binding sites for the activation of target cardiac promoters [
It has been well-established that hypertension and stimulation with isoproterenol, phenylephrine, endothelin or other hypertrophic signals can activate GATA-4 through the MEK/ERK pathway to promote GATA-4 serine105 p38 phosphorylation for higher binding of GATA-4 on the specific promoter region to increase the transcriptional activity [
We have demonstrated that hyperglycemia-induced ROS activate the MEK/ERK pathway to increase GATA-4 phosphorylation for higher transcription.
Given that RSK4, a p53-related gene, participates in Ras-MEK-ERK pathway and could regulate senescence, we postulate that RSK4 might be a mediator in EPCs senescence in DM.
Mutant BRAF led to deregulated activation of downstream MEK/ERK effectors in melanoma patients.
BRAF serine/threonine kinase is a member of the RAF kinase family involved in the RAS/RAF/MEK/ERK kinase cascade, which regulates cellular differentiation and proliferation [
When the IGF-I receptor is stimulated, the downstream signaling pathways, including PI3K-AKT-TOR and RAF-MEK-ERK, are activated [
One of these is a pathway dependent on phosphoinositide-3 kinase and MEK-extracellular signal-regulated kinase (ERK) signaling.
Three kinase enzymes are part of this pathway: mitogen-activated protein kinase (MAPK), MEK, and extracellular signal-regulated kinase (ERK) [
Our data establish that inhibition of BRAF in the presence of oncogenic RAS hyperactivates CRAF, MEK, and ERK.
In this study, we show that inhibition of BRAF by chemical or genetic means in the presence of oncogenic or growth-factor activated RAS induces BRAF binding to CRAF, leading to CRAF hyperactivation and consequently elevated MEK and ERK signaling.
For western blotting the following antibodies were used: rabbit anti-ppMEK1/2 and mouse anti-myc 9B11 (Cell Signaling Technology); mouse anti-NRAS (C-20), rabbit anti-ERK2 (C-14), rabbit anti-ARAF (C-20), mouse anti-BRAF (F-7) (Santa Cruz Biotechnology); mouse anti-Tubulin, and mouse anti-ppERK1/2 (Sigma); mouse anti-CRAF (for western blotting) (BD Transduction Laboratories).
BRAF Inhibitors Activate CRAF, MEK, and ERK in RAS Mutant Cell Lines
Cell lysates were western blotted for NRAS, CRAF, phospho-MEK (ppMEK), phospho-ERK (ppERK) and tubulin (loading control).
The lysates were also western blotted for BRAF, CRAF, phospho-MEK (ppMEK), phospho-ERK (ppERK) and total ERK2.
BRAF, CRAF, phospho-MEK (ppMEK), phospho-ERK (ppERK) and total ERK2 levels in the cell lysates are also shown.
KSR2_921 was expressed at a lower level and had a reduced ability to bind B-Raf and facilitate MEK and ERK phosphorylation.
Using confocal microscopy, we investigated the intracellular localization of WT and mutant KSR2 expressed in Cos7 cells and its colocalization with endogenous B-Raf, MEK, or ERK.
To determine whether KSR2 mutations affect Ras-Raf-MEK-ERK signaling, HEK293 cells were transfected with Flag-tagged WT and mutant forms of KSR2 and stimulated with EGF.
(A) Confocal microscopy of EGF-stimulated Cos7 cells showing the colocalization of transiently expressed KSR2 WT and the frameshift mutation, L822Pfsx26 (green), with endogenous B-Raf, MEK, and ERK (red) in the cytoplasm and plasma membrane (inset).
Subcellular Localization of KSR2 Mutants and Colocalization with B-Raf, MEK, and ERK, Related to 
Cells were coimmunostained with anti-Flag (green) and either: anti-B-Raf, anti-MEK or anti-ERK (red) antibodies and analyzed by confocal microscopy.
The result of focal adhesion signaling is activation of signaling pathways that are emerging as mechanically responsive and include focal adhesion kinase (FAK), the MEK/ERK pathway and activation of Rho itself.
Other Ras-MAPK components such as Raf, MEK and ERK are also being investigated and are proving more successful drug targets [
Addition of the MEK inhibitor U0126 into the transfected L02 cells described above inhibited ERK phosphorylation and hTERT expression.
Compared with normal bladder tissues, phosphorylation levels of B-Raf (Ser455), C-Raf (Ser338), MEK (1/2) and ERK significantly increased in bladder carcinoma tissues.
ASK1 was first identified as a member of the MAPKKK family and was found to activate the MAPKK 4 (MKK4)-JNK and MKK3/6-p38 pathways but not the MAP/ERK kinase (MEK)-extracellular signal-regulated kinase (ERK) pathway (Figure 
The ERK1/2 inhibitor PD98059, which blocks the upstream kinase (MEK1) of ERK1/2, the p38 inhibitor SB203580, and the PKC inhibitor Calphostin C were obtained from Sigma (St. Louis, MO).
The interactions between MAP kinase and its immediate upstream kinase (MAPKK) are highly specific: for instance, p42/p44 MAP kinases are phosphorylated solely by MAP/ERK kinase (MEK) 1 and 2; p38 MAP kinase is selectively activated by MAP kinase kinases (MKK) 3 and 6, while JNK is activated by MKK7 and MKK4 in most conditions, however MKK4 can sometimes activate p38 MAP kinase when over expressed.
MEK MAP/ERK kinase
The NCFC syndromes comprise neurofibromatosis (NF) and the Noonan (NS), Costello (CS), LEOPARD (LS) and cardio-facious-cutaneous (CFC) syndromes, which are correlated with autosomal-dominant germ-line mutations within either the core components (Ras, B-Raf, Raf-1, MEK) or modulators of the Ras/ERK pathway (NF1, SHP2, SOS and Spred).
Activation by the fibroblast growth factors (FGFs) leads to activation of the RAS-RAF-MEK-ERK (MAPK) pathway kinases, ultimately directing the cellular action, including proliferation, apoptosis, differentiation or senescence [
Following activation, Raf phosphorylates and activates mitogen-activated protein kinase (MAP) kinase (MEK) which in turn phosphorylates and activates the MAP kinases extracellular signal-regulated protein kinases ERK1 and ERK2 [
The activation of the MEK/ERK signaling pathway by Raf has been correlated with inhibition of programmed cell death.
Treatment with the MEK inhibitor PD98059 blocked the anti-apoptotic activity of B-Raf, indicating that the activation of the Raf-MEK-ERK signaling pathway is necessary for the anti-apoptotic role of B-Raf in Rat-1 fibroblasts [
It has been shown that Raf-1 promotes cell survival in a MEK/ERK-independent manner via antagonizing apoptosis signal-regulating kinase-1 (ASK-1) [
We previously found that the ERK scaffold MEK Partner 1 (MP1) is required for focal adhesion disassembly in fibroblasts.
MEK Partner 1 (MP1) is a putative scaffolding protein that binds MEK1 and ERK [
The Ser/Thr-kinase B-Raf represents an important signaling element of the Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK pathway [
Raf is the MAPKKK in the first MAPK pathway identified, the Ras-Raf-MEK-ERK pathway.
A recent example is the scaffold KSR2, member of the extended Raf family and well known for its role in coordinating Raf-MEK-ERK complexes [
They are regulated by phosphorylation via the classical mitogen-activated protein kinase (MAPK) pathway involving the GTPase Ras, which activates the serine-threonine kinases Raf, MEK and ERK.
This activation was not accompanied by enhanced ERK1/2 or MEK1/2 phosphorylation [
MEK Partner 1 (MP1 or MAPKSP1) is a scaffold protein that has been reported to function in multiple signaling pathways, including the ERK, PAK and mTORC pathways.
The small protein MEK Partner 1 (MP1, also known as Map Kinase Scaffold Protein 1 and LAMTOR3) was originally identified as a scaffold protein that potentiates MAPK signaling by binding to MEK1 and ERK1 [
Phosphoimmunoblotting of PCMOs indicated that both EGF and HB-EGF activated MEK-1/2 and ERK1/2 in a concentration-dependent fashion with the effect of EGF being more prominent.
The results suggested that the addition of EGF or HB-EGF to PCMO differentiation medium superactivates MEK/ERK signaling which then increases both PCMO proliferation, number, and functional differentiation of PCMO-derived NeoHepatocytes.
ERK and MEK activation is involved in M-CSF and EGF-induced proliferation of PCMOs.
To test whether this is associated with activation of MEK/ERK signaling, we performed immunoblot analysis of ERK activation (Figure 
Since both EGF and HB-EGF are known to stimulate ERK activation, we reasoned that these agents may enhance proliferation by superactivating the MEK/ERK pathway.
To test this prediction, PCMOs were generated in standard PCMO differentiation medium in the absence or presence of either EGF or HB-EGF and subjected to immunoblot analysis of phospho-MEK and phospho-ERK.
The results indicated that both EGF and HB-EGF activated MEK and ERK and that the effect was concentration-dependent and more prominent in EGF-treated than in HB-EGF-treated PCMOs (Figure 
M-CSF and IL-3 present in the PCMO generation medium induce a proliferative response in a subset of monocytes through activation of MEK/ERK1/2 signaling (see Figure 
The present data reveal that EGF and HB-EGF improve the proliferation of PCMOs by superactivating MEK/ERK signaling.
The transduction of a cellular signal as it propagates through the MAPK cascades, exemplified by the Raf/MEK/ERK module, is predominantly controlled by phosphorylation events where typically, each kinase in the cascade is activated by an upstream kinase and inactivated by relevant phosphatases.
DUB: De-ubiquitinating enzyme; EGF: Epidermal growth factor; EGFR: Epidermal growth factor receptor; ERK: Extracellular signal-regulated kinase; Cbl: Casitas b-lineage lymphoma; RTK: Receptor tyrosine kinase; EPS15: Epidermal growth factor receptor substrate 15; MVB: Multivesicular body; UIM: Ubiquitin-interacting motif; HRS: Hepatocyte growth factor-regulated tyrosine kinase substrate; HECT: Homologous to the E6-AP carboxyl terminus; STAMP: Signal transducing adaptor molecule; STAMBP: STAM binding protein; USP8: Ubiquitin specific peptidase 8; Rab5: Ras-related protein Rab5; GEF: Guanine nucleotide exchange factor; GA: Benzoquinone ansamycin Geldanamycin; JNK: c-Jun N-terminal kinase; MEKK1: MEK kinase 1; ITCH Itchy: E3 ubiquitin protein ligase; NEDD4: Neural precursor cell expressed developmentally down-regulated protein 4; Rpn4: Regulatory particle non-ATPase; RING1B: Really interesting new gene 1 protein.
The canonical ERK pathway consists of three kinase tiers: Raf, MEK (MAPK and ERK kinase) and ERK.
ERK/MAPK scaffolds, in the narrow sense, assemble two or all three tiers of the canonical ERK pathway (Raf, MEK and ERK), thus - when expressed at optimal stoichiometry - facilitating and accelerating ERK activation, but at the same time restricting signal amplification.
KSR1, which binds to Raf, MEK and ERK, belongs to this category.
Scaffold proteins in the broader sense associate with one or more members of the MAPK pathway within a larger complex or protein platform, such as paxillin, which interacts with Raf, MEK and ERK within the focal adhesion complex [
The possibilities include (1) direct interaction of caveolin-1 and IQGAP1, (2) sequential or (3) simultaneous interaction with the Raf-MEK-ERK cassette, possibly through dimerization of Raf, MEK and/or ERK [
Our data show that the phorbol ester stimulated pathway PKC-Ras-Raf-MEK-ERK is broken down into two modules, of which one, PKC-Ras-(C-)Raf, is assembled at the caveolae with the help of caveolin-1, and the other one, (B-)Raf-MEK-ERK, is tethered to the actin cytoskeleton with the help of IQGAP1.
We show that MDA-MB-231 breast tumour cells negatively regulate CCN2 and type I collagen gene expression in CCD-1068SK fibroblasts in a Smad7-dependent manner through decreased activation of the MEK/ERK signalling pathway.
Previous studies have shown that the MEK/ERK signalling pathway is a positive regulator of CCN2 gene expression [
To determine whether decreased activation of the MEK/ERK signalling pathway could be associated with decreased expression of CCN2 and type I collagen, CCD-1068SK fibroblasts were cultured in the presence of the MEK pathway inhibitor U0126.
Investigating the intracellular signalling events leading to CCN2 and type I collagen down-regulation, we found that tumour cell-mediated up-regulation of Smad7 negatively affected the MEK/ERK pathway.
Previous studies have suggested that Ras/MEK/ERK signalling positively regulates CCN2 promoter activity and is required for basal CCN2 promoter activity [
BDNF: Brain-derived neutrophic factor; CAV: Caveolin; CN: Clinostat; CTGF: Connective tissue growth factor; EGF: Epidermal growth factor; ERK: Extracellular signal-regulated kinase; FCS: Fetal calf serum; FTC: Follicular thyroid cancer; GBF: Ground-based facilities; GM-CSF: Granulocyte-macrophage colony-stimulating factor; IFN: Interferon; IL: Interleukin; ITBG1: Integrin beta 1; LDD: Least detectable dose; MAP: Multi-Analyte Profiling; MCP: Monocyte chemotactic protein; MCTS: Multicellular tumor spheroids; MEK: Mitogen-activated protein kinases; MIP: Macrophage inflammatory protein; MMP: Matrix metalloproteinase; MRNA: Messenger ribonucleic acid; PCR: Polymerase chain reaction; PDGFR: Platelet-derived growth factor receptor; PRKCA: Protein kinase C alpha; RBM: Rules-based medicine; RPM: Random positioning machine; RWV: Rotating Wall Vessel; SCF: Stem cell factor; SD: Standard deviation.
It is not surprising that co-incubation of MEKi with FGF2 was expected to show uniform inhibition of pERK.
One of the sets gave almost no response to MEKi while two others incorrectly predicted pERK response to stimulation by FGF2.
As expected previously, matching model prediction with the more stringent experimental test of fitting pERK response to FGF2 and MEKi scheduled with a time lag helps identify physiologically relevant parameter sets for the FGFR pathway.
where m is equal to the number of FGF concentrations used, n is equal to the number of intracellular molecules considered (ERK, MEK, FRS2 and FGFR) and m(i,j) is equal to the peak level of phosphorylated molecules of species j for FGF concentration 
Western blotting showed ILK expression and phosphorylation of MEK1/2 and ERK1/2 in MKN45 cells treated with MG132.
Insulin-like growth factor I (IGF-I) is a hormone that promotes proliferation, differentiation, and survival in a number of cells types mediated principally through PI3K/Akt, and Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK pathways (
In addition to the MEK/ERK pathway, PI3K-Akt pathway also plays a critical role in cell survival.
(B) PDGF maintained increased phosphorylation of ERK for at least 1 h, and this effect was abolished by PDGF receptor antagonist STI-571, MEK inhibitor U0126 but not by PI3-K inhibitor LY294002; STI: STI-571: LY: LY294002.
ERK5 is a non-redundant mitogen-activated protein kinase (MAPK) stimulated in response to growth factors and cellular stresses via the MAPK kinase 5 (MEK5) (
The binding of NGF to TrkA activates the PI3K-Akt (phosphatidylinositol 3-kinase-Akt) and Raf-MEK-ERK (Raf-MAPK/extracellular signal-regulated kinase kinase-extracellular signal-regulated kinase) signalling pathways, which promote the growth and survival of sympathetic neurons.
NGF deprivation decreases the activity of the PI3K-Akt and Raf-MEK-ERK survival pathways, but increases the activity of the MLK-JNK-c-Jun (mixed lineage kinase-c-Jun N-terminal kinase-Jun proto-oncogene) pathway, which is required for the increased expression of BH3-only proteins and for mitochondrial cytochrome 
The binding of NGF to its receptor TrkA can also activate the Raf-MEK-ERK signalling pathway.
We also detected the activation of extracellular signal-regulated kinase (ERK) and the knockdown of ERK regulator mitogen-activated protein kinase kinase (MEK)1/2 or overexpression of a dominant-negative (DN) ERK inhibited CB-induced glioma cell death upstream of the mitochondria.
Furthermore, MEK inhibitors or overexpression of a DN ERK failed to significantly inhibit X-ray-induced T98G and U251 cell death.
Bim is known to be critical in killing of melanoma cells by inhibition of the RAF/MEK/ERK pathway.
It is well established that blockade of the RAF/MEK/ERK pathway inhibits melanoma cell growth.
Several mechanisms have been reported to contribute to apoptosis induced by inhibition of the RAF/MEK/ERK pathway.
Immunoblotting was performed with the following antibodies: p-AKTser473 (Cell Signaling 9271), AKT (Cell Signaling 9272), p-mTOR (Cell Signaling 2971), p-ERK (Cell Signaling 4377), ERK (Cell Signaling 4695), p-MEK (Cell Signaling 2338) and MEK (Cell Signaling 4694).
Other reports suggest involvement of the MAP/ERK kinase (MEK)-1/-2 pathway in vacuolation.
The signaling cascades downstream of RTKs and NRTKs include mainly the Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK, JAK/STAT and the PI3K/AKT pathways.
In particular, the Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK signaling cascade has a pivotal role in the molecular circuitry of CRPC, and the majority of the RTKs upregulated in prostate cancer have been shown to activate Ras.
The Raf/MEK/ERK signaling cascades that leads to phosphorylation/inactivation of Bad and upregulation of the anti-apoptotic Bcl-2 family members is critical for the survival of 22Rv1 cells and sorafenib, by targeting this signaling cascade is highly efficacious in killing these cells.
We determined whether and to which extent sorafenib might mediate its pro-apoptotic action by inhibiting the Raf/MEK/ERK pathway.
One of the best-characterized targets of sorafenib is the Raf/MEK/ERK pathway.
With regard to the lack of ERK phosphorylation in PC3 cells, it has been previously reported that metastatic cell lines express low levels of the proteins involved in the Raf/MEK/ERK axis.
In prostate cancer, the tumor stroma activates RTKs in the prostate cancer cells via the secretion of cytokines (e.g., PDGF, VEGF), hence stimulating the oncogenic signaling cascades Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK and PI3K/AKT.
The primary antibodies used in this study pSrc (Y416), Src, MEK1, phospho-ERK1/2 (Thr202/Tyr204), ERK1/2 PTEN, cleaved caspase-3, cleaved caspase-7, cleaved-PARP, phosphor-AKT (Ser473), AKT, pBAD (Ser112), BAD, ATG-5, Mcl-1, LC3 I/II, Bcl-2, PDGFR
In this study, we show that Bmf is regulated at the post-translational level by mutant B-RAF-MEK-ERK2 signaling.
The basal MEK/ERK pathway activity is low in 293FT cells and no apparent electrophoretic mobility shift was detected when Bmf was expressed alone or together with ERK2 WT (
Our studies relate to cell survival mechanisms in mutant B-RAF melanomas with elevated MEK-ERK1/2 pathway activity.
Inhibiting the upstream MAPK/ERK1/2 kinase (MEK) by adding U0126 with each dose of MPP
Specifically, Myc-mediated transcription (downstream of MEK-ERK signaling) both enhances glucose uptake and diverts glucose carbon into the nonoxidative pentose phosphate pathway to facilitate nucleotide biosynthesis.
As MEK/ERK activity can phosphorylate Bim
Although the role of MEK/ERK signaling in phosphorylation of Bim
Activation of the MEK/ERK pathway has been well documented to protect cells from ER stress-induced apoptosis.
The siRNA constructs used are: MEK1 siGENOME SMARTpool (M-003571-01-0010), ERK1 siGENOME SMARTpool (M-003592-03-0005), ERK2 siGENOME SMARTpool (M-003555-04-0005), CHOP siGENOME SMARTpool (M-004819-03-0005), and non-targeting siRNA pool (D-001206-13-20) as control.
Whereas our results show that Bak apoptotic function is not directly regulated by phosphorylation, multiple targets upstream of Bak may be regulated by phosphorylation, and thus account for the ability of MEK/ERK signaling and PTPN5 to regulate Bak-mediated apoptosis.
To that end, lovastatin was shown to induce apoptosis in AML cells by downregulating the pro-survival Raf-MEK-ERK pathway.
To further examine whether the promoting effect of mutant p53 on EGF-induced sustained ERK1/2 activation is due to enhanced phosphorylation of ERK1/2 or decreased dephosphorylation of phosphorylated-ERK1/2 (p-ERK1/2), p53-273H-expressing or control H1299 cells were pre-treated with EGF before the addition of MEK-1 (MAP ERK kinase) inhibitor U0126 at the different time points.
To clarify the signaling pathways in ESA-mediated apoptosis, we investigated the functions of RIP1, MEK, ERK, as well as AIF.
Necrostatin (Nec)-1 blocked MEK/ERK phosphorylation and ESA-mediated apoptosis.
Nec1 blocked the interaction of MEK with ERK upon ESA stimulation.
Here, we show that a novel RIP1-dependent apoptotic cell death induced by ESA is mediated through MEK/ERK pathway.
MEK/ERK pathway appears to be involved in ESA-mediated apoptosis.
RIP1 constitutively associates with ERK1/2, and transiently associates with MEK2.
RIP1 can mediate MEK/ERK signaling cascades in a manner different from that previously published, such as dephosphorylation.
We conclude that ESA activates phosphatases such as calcineurin followed by dephosphorylation of RIP1 as well as AIF, which results in the activation of ERK signaling pathway through MEK1/2 activation.
Antibodies against MEK (61B12), ERK, phospho-ERK, caspase-3 and glyceraldehyde 3-phosphate dehydrogenase (GAPDH, clone 14C10) were purchased from Cell Signaling Technology (Danvers, MA, USA).
ERK1/2 is activated through MEK1/2 phosphorylation and association with RIP1 complex.
(2) Phosphorylated MEK1/2/ activates ERK1/2 associated with RIP1.
Induction of melanoma cell death by HDAC inhibitors or blockade of the RAF/MEK/ERK pathway is associated with the up-regulation of Bim and the downregulation of Mcl-1.
Although we and others have previously found that upregulation of Bim is important for killing of sensitive melanoma cells by inhibition of the MEK/ERK pathway,
The effect of ROS on the mitogen-activated protein kinase/extracellular signal-regulated kinase (MEK)-extracellular signal-regulated kinase (ERK) 1/2 pathway may be another possible mechanism underlying MK commitment.
This analysis identified activation of known DNA damage response pathways (e.g., phosphorylation of MKK3/6, p38, MK2, Hsp27, p53 and Chk1) as well as of prosurvival (e.g., MEK-ERK, cAMP response element-binding protein (CREB), protein kinase C (PKC)) and antiapoptotic markers (e.g., Bad, Bcl-2).
To elucidate whether PKC or other main signaling cascades regulate cell viability in NHFs upon IR treatment, a radiosensitivity screen with inhibitors specific for key components of the MEK-ERK, p38, JNK or PKC pathways was performed (
Previously, RAF/MEK/ERK-mediated signaling was implicated in the sorafenib-induced anticancer effect.
Therefore, the above results together suggest that inhibition of the PI3K/AKT and MEK/ERK pathways by atorvastatin in KRAS mutant NSCLC cells correlates with disruption of the Kras/Raf and Kras/PI3K complexes irrespective of the PIK3CA and PTEN statuses.
These data together suggest that inhibition of the MEK/ERK and PI3K/AKT pathways is closely related to the antitumor activity of statins in various tumors.
A recent report describes that ERK2, a downstream kinase of Ras-Raf-MEK-ERK pathway, can directly phosphorylate components of WAVE2 complex, WAVE2 and Abi1, essential for interaction of WAVE complex with Arp2/3 and actin to mediate actin polymerization and lamellipodia formation.
Several solid tumors have a hyper-activated MEK/ERK pathway and ERK was already proposed to be a regulator of MT dynamics and mitosis.
Obserivng the relationship among P-FAKSer732, MEK/ERK activation and polymerized tubulin (
MEK/ERK pathway is one of the downstream effector of EGFR
These data strongly indicate that EGFR/MEK/ERK/CDK5 pathway induces the phosphorylation of FAK at Ser732 independently from the FAK autophosphorylation, thus contributing to spindle formation and mitosis of tumor cells.
Hence, FAK can exert in tumor cells a dual role: one, fully described elsewhere, integrin-dependent associated to phosphorylation of Tyr397 and -576 with a role in migration, and the other, characterized here for the first time, integrin-independent associated to phosphorylation on Ser732 upon activation of the EGFR/MEK/ERK/CDK5 pathway, regulating MT dynamics.
We also showed that P-FAKSer732 was generated by the activation of the EGFR/MEK//ERK/CDK5 signaling.
The MEK/ERK pathway is involved in the phosphorylation at Ser732 associated with polymerized MTs.
EGF-dependent EGFR/MEK/ERK/CDK5 pathway induces P-FAKSer732, thus contributing to mitosis.
In the cells, Jak-Stat, p38MAPK, PI3K-AKT-mTOR, and Ras-Raf-MEK-ERK pathways are interdependent, interconnected signaling pathways that are responsible for regulating, integrating, and balancing various signals from exogenous or endogenous stimulators, including growth factors, cytokines, and stress stimuli (
In this study, we showed that ERK MEKs and PI3K/Akt pathways are coregulated in NPCs cotransduced and transfected with miR-9 lentivirus/MCPIP1-overexpressing constructs (
As they are almost exclusively activated downstream of extracellular signal-regulated kinases 1 and 2 (ERK1/2), therapeutic intervention by RSK inhibition is less likely to produce such severe side effects as those observed following inhibition of the upstream master regulators Raf, MEK and ERK1/2.
Mutational activation of RAS proteins is associated with the occurrence of almost 30% of all human tumors, but due to off-target and severe side effects clinical trials based on small molecule inhibitors targeting participating downstream kinases including Raf, MEK and ERK1/2 have so far not been very successful.
There is substantial cross-talk between PI3K/AKT and MEK/ERK pathways, and the inhibition of either pathway leads to activation of the other one.
Furthermore, AKT phosphorylates C-Raf Ser259 that leads to inhibition of the MEK/ERK pathway.
However, in our study, the MEK inhibitor U0126 did not block DC120-induced phosphorylation of P70S6K and 4E-BP1, and the mTORC1 inhibitor RAD001 did not alleviate the phosphorylation of ERK1/2 (
To further elucidate the role of p38 and ERK1/2 signaling in BMP-2-induced Runx2 activity in an inflammatory environment, we ectopically induced p38 and ERK1/2 signaling activation before exposure to BMP-2 by transfection with CA-MKK3 or CA-MEK1, respectively.
Transfection with CA-MKK3 or CA-MEK1 induced strong expression and phosphorylation of p38 and ERK1/2 signaling, respectively, in C2C12 cells without BMP-2 or TNF-
PI3K/AKT and MEK/ERK pathways have pivotal role in fundamental cellular functions such as cell proliferation, cell growth, and survival by phosphorylating a variety of substrates.
Anti-Gli1 (3538), anti-Phospho-MEK1/2 (9154), anti-MEK1/2 (9126), anti-Phospho-ERK1/2 (4344), anti-ERK1/2 (4695), and anti-
We reported earlier that MM activated MEK1/2 (assessed by ERK1/2) and downstream JNK pathways, and thereby affected cultured astrocytes.
TrkA can activate PI3K/Akt, MEK/ERK1/2 and phospholipase C (PLC) signalling pathways.
Rasfonin clearly inhibited c-Raf, MEK and ERK phosphorylation, but had no significant effect on total MEK and ERK levels (
Silencing ADCY5 stimulated EGFR translocation to mitochondria, resulting in upregulation of ERK and MEK.
ADCY5 knockout mice showed increased longevity as a result of activating Raf/MEK/ERK signaling and cAMP levels.
Our findings indicate that RAGE preferentially binds to mutant KRAS to activate the RAF-MEK-ERK and PI3K-AKT pathways, which contributes to HIF1
P27 maintains PHLPP expression, which inhibits Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK/ p90RSK/S6 cascade.
Recent evidence indicates that Raf Kinase Inhibitory Protein regulates the mitotic spindle assembly checkpoint by controlling Aurora B Kinase activity, and the mechanism involves Raf/MEK/ERK signaling.
Activated Raf-1 was localized on early mitotic kinetochores, activation of the MAP kinase cascade mimicked effects of RKIP depletion, and inhibition of ERK1,2 signaling by either drugs, dominant-negative MEK, or siRNA for Raf-1 rescued defects caused by RKIP loss.
RKIP, Raf Kinase Inhibitory Protein; MAP kinase, mitogen activated protein kinase; ERK, extracellular signal regulated kinase; MEK, MAP/ERK kinase; PKC, protein kinase C
MEK1 and MEK2, two kinases upstream of ERK, have been shown to regulate cell cycle progression in two distinct ways [
Regardless of the nature of the upstream signal, MEK1 autoactivation represents an alternate means of ERK pathway activation.
Cell proliferation is regulated by multiple pathways such as the Raf-MEK-ERK, NF-kB or phosphatidylinositol- 3 kinase (PI3K)-AKT pathways
[
The experiments above indicate that MEK, ERK, MLCK, and Myosin II each contribute partially to SCV-associated F-actin.
To study whether MEK, ERK, and Myosin are in the same SteC-induced pathway, we examined SCV-associated Myosin IIB in cells depleted of ERK1/2 or MEK1/2.
Whereas the Raf/MEK/ERK signaling pathway is well studied in relation to cell proliferation, apoptosis, differentiation, and immune responses (
MEK and ERK Contribute to F-Actin Meshwork Formation
MEK1 phosphorylation leads to the activation of a signal transduction pathway involving ERK, MLCK, and Myosin IIB to induce cytoskeletal rearrangements in the vicinity of 
Activation of the EGFR induces cell survival by stimulating the Ras-MEK-ERK and phosphoinositol 3-phosphate kinase (PI3K)-Akt pathways.
In particular, evidence obtained in HT-29 CRC cells revealed induction of autophagy through the extracellular signal-regulated kinases ERK1 and ERK2, when stimulated by the RAS-RAF-MEK pathway [
In this context, MAPK/ERK kinase kinase 3 (MEKK3) is activated by autophosphorylation of Ser526.
The ERK pathway represents the prototypical example of a mitogen-activated protein kinase (MAPK) cascade where ERK (a MAPK) is activated by MEK, a MAPK kinase (MAPKK), which in turn is activated by RAF, a MAPKK kinase (MAPKKK).
Subsequently, different signaling molecules are recruited to the activated receptors, which leads to activation of kinases such as the Ser/Thr kinase RAF (rapidly accelerating fibrosarcoma) which in turn phosphorylates and activates MEK (MAP kinase kinase, a dual specificity Tyr/Thr kinase) which is responsible for activating the MAP kinases such as extracellular signal regulated kinases 1 and 2 (ERK1/2).
Knockdown of flotillin-2 in HeLa cells was accompanied by an increase in the basal phosphorylation of the cRAF kinase, MEK1/2 and ERK1/2, indicating that the ERK1/2 pathway is overactive in the absence of flotillin-2 [
Under non-pathological conditions, MAPK/ERK signaling components are expressed in most regions of the brain, and show a largely overlapping expression pattern (with the exception of MEK2, which is almost completely absent) [
The total Raf1 and ERK1/2 protein level did not change, but those of K-RAS, p-Raf1, MEK1, p-MEK1, and p-ERK1/2 decreased.
A previous study showed that the total Raf1, ERK1/2, or MEK1 protein level was unchanged when RAS/MAPK signaling pathways were activated.
We have explored the possible role of dual specificity phosphatases (DUSPs) on acute EGF-mediated ERK signalling using high content imaging and a delayed MEK inhibition protocol to distinguish direct and indirect effects of the phosphatases on ERK activity.
They are activated by MAPK/ERK kinases (MEKs) 1 and 2 which catalyse the phosphorylation of Thr and Tyr residues in the ERK TEY activation loops 
The effect of the MEK inhibitor demonstrates the importance of continuous MEK activity for the observed ppERK1/2 responses and provides a method for monitoring the kinetics of ERK inactivation in isolation.
That is, in normal cells ppERK1/2 responses are shaped by feed-forward activation of MEK and by negative feedback and cross-talk from other MAPK pathways upstream of MEK, as well as by direct dephosphorylation of ERK1/2, but if MEK could be completely and instantly inhibited (MEK inhibition after stimulation) ERK1/2 inactivation kinetics would reflect solely the direct dephosphorylation of ppERK1/2.
Together, the mathematical and experimental approaches described above demonstrate the potential for modulation of basal and stimulated ppERK1/2 levels by direct alteration of dephosphorylation or by alteration of feedback, and the utility of delayed MEK inhibitor protocol for delineating these direct and indirect effects.
The data above suggest that the JNK/p38 MKPs have no direct effect on ERK activity in cells acutely stimulated with EGF (because they have no effect on inactivation kinetics in the presence of the MEK inhibitor) but instead have an indirect positive regulatory effect that is overcome by siRNA-mediated knock-down.
We have explored the possible role of DUSPs on acute EGF-mediated ERK signalling using high content imaging and a delayed MEK inhibition protocol to distinguish direct and indirect effects on ERK activity.
Rates of ERK inactivation after MEK inhibition were estimated (assuming exponential decay after MEK addition).
Finally, oncogenic Ras is able to provide resistance to pro-apoptotic cisplatin-based chemotherapy in part via modulating MEK-ERK signaling 
Each dimer can subsequently trigger various intracellular signaling pathways, including those of PI3K/Akt, Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK, and STATs, which all play important roles in cellular oncogenic processes such as proliferation, survival, motility, and angiogenesis. 
EGFR signals through the RAS/RAF/MEK/ERK and PI3K/AKT pathways to promote cellular proliferation and survival.
 drugs inhibiting RAS-RAF-MEK-ERK pathway,
The RAS-RAF-MEK-ERK which is involved in regulation of cell cycle is activated in many cancers due to mutations in BRAF or RAS genes [
MEK: MAPK (mitogen-activated protein kinase) kinases/extracellular-signal-regulated kinases, ERK: extracellular-signal-related kinase; PTEN: phosphatase and tensin homolog, mTOR: mammalian target of rapamycin. 
The RAF/MEK/ERK pathway was the first RAS effector pathway identified and the best characterized.
Arsenic trioxide is a potent inducer of autophagy in acute leukemia cells, and such induction is dependent on activation of the MEK/ERK pathway but uncoupled from JNK.
These effects are dependent on Akt down-regulation, vitamin D3 disassociation with Raf1, and subsequent activation of Raf/MEK/ERK2 MAPK signaling.
Besides, sorafenib combined with cytotoxic drug shows an impossible synergism as that sorafenib inhibits the Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK pathway, which will prevent activation of the multidrug resistance pathway that mainly induce the failure of chemotherapy in HCC
B-RAF and MEK are both involved in the RAS-RAF-MEK-ERK cascade signaling pathway, regulating several important cellular functions, such as cell survival, proliferation, and apoptosis resistance
MEK/ERK-dependent B7-H1 expression in HSCs.
The signal initiated by RTKs is transduced and amplified through downstream molecule cascades, such as Ras-MAPK, Ras-Raf-MEK-ERK-Elk, and the pro-survival AKT/phosphoinositide 3-hydroxykinase pathway [for an outstanding review, see Patra 
Activation of the Raf Sarcoma (RAS) family of GTPases by growth factors or by RAS mutation then drives activation of the RAF kinase family (ARAF, BRAF, CRAF) with subsequent phosphorylation and activation of MEK kinases (MEK 1 and 2) and extracellular signal- regulated kinases (ERK 1 and 2).
Genetic aberrations in the MAPK pathway are present in over 80% of cutaneous melanomas, involving abnormalities in RAS, RAF, MEK and ERK.
RAS in turn activates RAF (proto-oncogene RAF protein), MEK, and ERK through phosphorylation (
Selumetinib (AZD6244/ARRY-142886, AstraZeneca) is an orally active new inhibitor that binds to MEK to block the RAF/MEK/ERK pathway, which appears to be the most significant signaling pathway in HCC development (
Simplified pathway diagram showing EGFR signaling through the RAS/MEK/ERK and PI3K/PDK1/AKT pathways, illustrating the points of mutation/amplification in EGFR TKI resistance, along with other mechanisms.
To further characterize global ERK1/2-induced changes in membrane protein phosphorylation within human RBCs, a label-free quantitative phosphoproteomic analysis was applied to sickle and normal RBC membrane ghosts pre-treated with U0126, a specific inhibitor of MEK1/2, the upstream kinase of ERK1/2, in the presence or absence of recombinant active ERK2.
The abundance of twelve of the thirty-six phosphopeptides were subsequently increased in normal RBCs co-incubated with recombinant ERK2 and therefore represent specific MEK1/2 phospho-inhibitory targets mediated via ERK2.
These findings also identify additional protein targets of this pathway other than the RBC adhesion molecule ICAM-4 and enhance the understanding of the mechanism of small molecule inhibitors of MEK/1/2/ERK1/2, which could be effective in ameliorating RBC hemorheology and adhesion, the hallmarks of SCD.
Recently, we have shown that extracellular signal-regulated kinase (ERK1/2) is hyperactive and can be inducible in SS but not in AA RBCs, and can act downstream of the cAMP/PKA/MEK1/2 pathway
[
To further characterize global MEK1/2/ERK1/2-induced changes in protein phosphorylation within human RBCs, we employed a previously established label-free quantitative phosphoproteomics strategy to the plasma membrane ghosts of human RBCs
[
To further characterize global MEK1/2/ERK1/2-induced changes in protein phosphorylation within human SS RBCs, a global label-free quantitative phosphoproteomic discovery analysis of SS and AA RBC plasma membrane ghosts was performed
[
Putative downstream targets specific to MEK1/2-dependent activation of ERK1/2 were initially identified in SS RBCs, in which 36 unique phosphopeptides (from 21 unique phosphoproteins) decreased in abundance upon treatment with U0126.
Here we applied a label-free quantitative phosphoproteomic strategy to characterize signaling pathways from healthy and sickle RBC membrane fractions in the presence or absence of a specific MEK1/2 inhibitor with and without subsequent ERK2 activation.
Interestingly, these data revealed that glycophorin A phosphorylation was highly differentiated between healthy and sickle RBCs, and its levels of phosphorylation were modulated by the presence of the MEK1/2 inhibitor U0126 and the presence of exogenously spiked ERK2.
PKA, protein kinase A; DARPP-32, dopamine-and cAMP-regulated phosphoprotein with molecular weight 32; CREB, cAMP response element-binding; GSK-3, glycogen synthase kinase-3; Dvl, dishevelled; ERK1/2, extralcellular signal-regulated kinases 1/2; MEK, mitogen-activated protein kinase kinase; p90RSK, p90 ribosomal S6 kinase; PP2A, protein phosphatase 2A; EGF, epidermal growth factor; MKP1, mitogen-activated protein kinase phosphatases 1.
4EBP1: eukaryotic translation initiation factor E4-binding protein 1; BAC: bacterial artificial chromosome; CNA: copy number alterations; CSF1R: colony-stimulating factor 1 receptor; DAPI: 4.6-diamidino-2-phenylindole; EGFR: epidermal growth factor receptor; ERK1/2: extracellular signal-regulated kinase; fdr: false discovery rate; HER2: v-ERBB2 Avian erythroblastic leukemia viral oncogene homolog 2; IHC: immunohistochemistry; IS: intimal sarcoma; MEK: mitogen-activated kinase kinase kinase 1; mTOR: mammalian target of rapamycin; NCBI: National Center for Biotechnology Information; PCR: polymerase chain reaction; PDGFR: platelet derived growth factor receptor; PI3K: phosphatidyl inositol 3 kinase; PKB or AKT: protein kinase B; RTK: receptor tyrosine kinase; S6K: ribosomal protein S6 kinase; SG: spectrum green; SO: spectrum orange; TK: tyrosine kinase; TKI: tyrosine kinase inhibitors; TMA: tissue microarrays.
However, the increased insulin concentrations increase signalling via the kinases of the MAPK pathway {p21Ras, Raf, MEK [MAPK/ERK (extracellular-signal-regulated kinase) kinase] and ERK} to increase cell proliferation and survival.
MEK, MAPK/ERK kinase.
Further experiments revealed that the MEK (mitogen-activated protein kinase/ERK kinase) inhibitor PD98059 potently inhibited ERK phosphorylation, as expected, and increased primary hepatocyte apoA-I production by 3-fold.
PD98059 is a potent inhibitor of MEK, the kinase that activates ERK.
Sorafenib induces growth inhibition and apoptosis in human HCC cells by inhibiting the RAF/MEK/ERK signaling pathway.
In this study, the activity of the RAF/MEK/ERK signaling pathway was determined by measuring the levels of ERK phosphorylation by Western blot analysis of HepG2 cells treated with sorafenib and VK2, either alone or in combination.
Previous studies have revealed that VK2 itself can inhibit the RAF/MEK/ERK signaling pathway by inhibiting RAS/RAF activation, thus causing a decrease in the levels of phosphorylated ERK in several cancer cell lines, including HCC HuH7 cells (
Both Raf/mitogen activated protein kinase kinase (MEK)/extracellular signal-regulated kinase (ERK) and phosphoinositide 3-kinase(PI3K)/Akt/mammalian target of rapamycin (mTOR) pathways are over-expressed and/or over-activated in pituitary tumors (
Loss of menin expression is associated with over-expression of the Raf/MEK/ERK and P13K/AKT/mTOR pathways in pancreatic tumors (
In addition, inactivated or absent menin promotes RAS expression; activating mutations of RAF, MEK, or ERK may accelerate cell proliferation (
The MEK-ERK pathway was early suggested as being involved in the activation of SOCE in human platelets, probably as a downstream effector of Ras proteins,
PP-induced suppression of hepatocyte apoptosis was shown to rely upon the activation of the MEK/ERK signalling pathway [
Phosphorylation of MEK1/2, upstream signal of ERK1/2, also happened.
We clarified that HSC proliferation in response to galectin-1 and galectin-3 could be mediated by a MEK1/2-ERK1/2 pathway.
It was found that some of these mutations could activate the RAF/MEK/ERK kinase pathway.
One of numerous postulated treatment strategies involves the application of the mitogen extracellular kinase (MEK) inhibitor which should block extracellular signal-regulated kinase (ERK).
Research on two MEK inhibitors showed that they protected against the abnormal activation of the RAF/MEK/ERK signal pathway.
BRAF is a member of the Raf family of serine threonine kinases (ARAF, BRAF, CRAF) which are part of the Ras/ Raf/MEK/ERK mitogen-activated protein kinase (MAPK) signalling pathway.
K-RAS mutations yield a defective GTPase activity and then an increased population of active K-RAS protein, activating signaling in two pathways, PI3K/PTEN/AKT and RAF/MEK/ERK which are involved in cell proliferation, survival and angiogenesis.
DAG, diacylglycerol; ERK, extracellular signal regulated kinase; GRB, growth factor receptor binding protein; MAPK, mitogen-activated protein kinase; MEK, mitogen-activated protein kinase kinase; PAMP, pathogen-associated molecular pattern; PI3K, phosphatidylinositol 3-kinase; PKC, protein kinase C; PLC, phospholipase C; SOS, son of sevenless; TLR, Toll-like receptor; TREM, triggering receptor expressed on myeloid cells; TREM-1L, TREM-1 ligand.
PE-induced IL-8 expression is also abolished in the presence of the MEK inhibitor U0126, indicating the involvement of ERK1/2 in this process.
The treatment of cells with PD98059, a selective inhibitor of ERK kinase (MEK), blocked both the protective effect of DADLE and the ERK phosphorylation induced by DADLE.
This activation induces mitogen ERK kinase kinase 2 (MEKK2) and c-jun N-terminal kinase (JNK) activation and phagocytosis of proatherogenic ox-LDL [
One of the most highly studied MAPK pathways is the extracellular signal-regulated kinase (ERK1/2) pathway, which transmits its signals through a series of activation steps involving receptor tyrosine kinases (RTKs), Ras, RAF (MAP3K), MEK (MAP2K), and ERK (MAPK).
We will highlight the development of direct and cascade assays for the RAF-MEK-ERK pathway using C-RAF, B-RAF, and B-RAF V599E.
The following kinases were all full-length: B-RAF, unactive MEK1, active MEK1, unactive-fluorescein-labeled MEK1, active ERK2, and unactive ERK2.
For double (MEK-ERK) and triple (RAF-MEK-ERK) cascade assays, it was necessary to first optimize the concentration of the unactivated kinase(s) prior to optimizing the concentration of the active kinase; this procedure is explained in the Results section.
Using this FRET-based method, cascade and direct assays were configured in order to recapitulate the RAF-MEK-ERK signaling pathway 
After defining the optimal concentration of unactivated ERK2 to use in the assay, we then optimized the concentration of MEK1.
In the case of the double cascade, active MEK1 was titrated with 140 nM unactivated ERK2 and ~50% phosphorylation of the substrate was seen with ~8 nM active MEK1 (Fig. 
The third step in the assay optimization process was to titrate each RAF isoform against unactivated MEK1 and ERK2 at the optimal concentration of each, as determined above (Fig. 
The RAF/MEK/ERK signaling pathway is ubiquitious in eukaryotic cells and regulates numerous physiologic processes such as cellular proliferation, differentiation, and survival [
Traditional radiometric RAF/MEK/ERK cascade assays have been reported [
The RAF/MEK/ERK signaling pathway forms a critical link between extra-cellular stimuli and intra-cellular responses that ultimately regulate cellular proliferation, differentiation, mobility, and survival.
Schematic of fluorescent assay formats used to characterize kinase inhibitors within the RAF-MEK-ERK pathway.
(D) Linear plots of the percent phosphorylation achieved for each of the triple cascades with increasing concentrations of active RAF isoform, using the optimized concentrations for unactive MEK1 (20 nM) and unactive ERK2 (140 nM), with R
ERK1/2 are activated via dual phosphorylation on specific tyrosine (Tyr204) and threonine (Thr202) residues by mitogen-activated or extracellular signal-regulated protein kinase kinase (MEK).
Radiation activates the MEK/ERK signaling pathway by increasing ROS generation.
For example, the somatic mutation V599E in BRAF, commonly observed in melanoma, is known to activate the MEK-ERK cascade constitutively [
BRD7 inhibits NPC cell cycle progression, preventing passage through G0/G1 by suppressing ras/MEK/ERK, Rb/E2F and Wnt signaling pathways.
Extra-cellular signals can be transmitted into the nucleus cell cycle machinery through diverse signaling pathways, among which MEK/ERK/MAPK is one intensively studied pathways [
The Raf-MEK-ERK pathway is commonly activated in human cancers, largely attributable to the extracellular signal-regulated kinases (ERKs) being a common downstream target of growth factor receptors, Ras, and Raf.
Therefore, inhibition of MEK-mediated ERK activation is very appealing in cancer therapy.
Although complex reasons may have contributed to this outcome, an alternative possibility is that the MEK-ERK pathway may not solely provide proliferation signals to malignancies, the central scientific rationale in developing MEK inhibitors for cancer therapy.
Accumulating evidence now demonstrated that the MEK-ERK pathway contributes to the proper execution of cellular DNA damage response (DDR), a major pathway of tumor suppression.
During DDR, the MEK-ERK pathway is commonly activated, which facilitates the proper activation of DDR checkpoints to prevent cell division.
Inhibition of MEK-mediated ERK activation, therefore, compromises checkpoint activation.
ERK1 and ERK2 (ERK1/2) kinases belong to the mitogen-activated protein kinase (MAPK) family and are activated by two highly conserved upstream kinases, MEK1/2 (MAPK kinase).
Inhibition of ERK activation with the commonly used MEK inhibitors (PD98059 and U0126) and a dominant negative MEK1K97M attenuates ETOP and HU-induced G2/M and S phase arrest in several cell lines, including NIH3T3, MCF7, MEF, and HCT116 [
While the underlying mechanisms responsible for DNA damage-induced ERK activation remain elusive, the accumulating evidence indicates that MEK mediates ERK activation in DDR.
The inhibition of MEK activation with MEK inhibitors (PD98059, U0126), a dominant negative MEK1K97M, and MEK siRNA inhibited ERK activation that is induced by a variety of genotoxic agents [
Research carried out in the last decade gradually consolidated the contributions of the MEK-ERK kinases to DDR.
ERK activity is widely regarded to provide proliferation signals to cancerous cells, the main underlying reason to target ERK activation by using MEK inhibitors.
This is consistent with the observation that activation of the RAF-MEK-ERK pathway is commonly associated with chemotherapy and radiotherapy [
The contribution of ERK to DDR outlines a scientific background for a combinational therapy involving genotoxic drugs and MEK inhibitors.
The growth factor mediated activation of the RAS/Raf/MEK/ERK/RSK1 pathway is another mechanism whereby
there can be crosstalk regulation of the AKT/mTOR signaling pathway.
Raf-MEK-ERK1/2 forms a regulatory complex with ENaC and inhibits its function.
For example, AM-induced proliferation and migration of lymphatic endothelial cells is mediated in part by cAMP and downstream MEK/ERK pathways [
Interruption of ERK signalling may occur by (1) hyperphosphorylation of Raf and MEK 1 and 2, (2) dephosphorylation of aminoacidic residues of ERK and (3) sequestration of ERK in the nucleus.
In regard to the levels of phosphorylation of Raf and MEK, it is possible that ERK, apart from phosphorylating downstream substrates, could also phosphorylate upstream targets, such as those two kinases [
The most commonly used strategy to prevent ERK activation is by blocking the activation of ERK by its upstream kinase MEK (Fig. 
The most commonly used approach to avert ERK phosphorylation consists in blocking the interaction between phosphorylated MEK and inactive ERK.
Previously we have reported that acute exposure to ammonium activated ouabain/Na,K-ATPase signalling pathway, which includes Src, EGF receptor, Raf, Ras, MEK and ERK
The released HB-EGF activates (phosphorylates) the EGF receptor (inhibited by AG1478), leading to activation of the MAP kinase cascade, Ras (inhibited by bumetanide), Raf and MEK (inhibited by U0126), with activation of MEK causing ERK1/2 phosphorylation.
Subsequently either 200 ml isotonic medium or 200 ml de-ionized water was added to each well, without any drug, together with 10 nM AVP; together with 1 mM AG1478 (inhibitor of EGF receptor); together with AVP and AG1478; or together with AVP and 10 mM U0126 (inhibitor of MAP kinase/ERK kinase (MEK) and thus of ERK1/2 phosphorylation), and the incubation was continued for another 22.5 min.
Another example where a pseudokinase forms complexes with active kinases are members of the kinase suppressor of Ras 1 and 2 (KSR1/2), that are essential for Ras induced activation of the RAF-MEK-ERK module in MAP kinase signalling.
When considering the cross-talk between Notch signaling and the RAS/MEK/ERK and PI-3K/Akt pathways downstream of EGFR and their roles in experimental gliomas, it is tempting to speculate that simultaneous inhibition of several of these pathways could lead to improved treatment of glioma patients.
The Ras-Raf-MEK-ERK MAPK pathway is a particularly well studied MAPK pathway unique to metazoans and consists of a three-tiered kinase cascade from Raf-to-ERK.

('MLK3', 'MKK3/6', 'adds_modification')
MLK3 stimulates the MAPKKs MKK3/6 and MKK4, which finally activate p38 and JNK MAPKs in the last steps of initiating HSC proliferation [

('RAF1', 'BRAF', 'binds')
Regorafenib also inhibits oncogenesis, in part, by selectively targeting the intracellular kinases BRAF and RAF1, an activator of downstream mitogen-activated protein kinases (MEK and ERK) that promote cell proliferation.

('MYC', 'MAX', 'increases')
Pharmacological inhibition of MYC/MAX heterodimer formation and MYC function in BL cell lines (using 10058-F4; Sigma-Aldrich, St Louis, MO, USA)
In addition to E2F1 and EF4 proteins, a higher level of MYC and MAX response protein was found HPV-positive OPC.
MAX is a bHLH-LZ protein required for MYC activity and through their association, the MYC/MAX complexes are able to activate the transcription of MYC target genes.
In fact they have been conducted on a limited number of samples and the predictive power of changes of factors such as MYC/MAX or E2F1, an alteration of this transcript profile, has not yet been established.

('EPH', 'EPHR', 'binds')
As a result, cell sorting is triggered by the asymmetric location of E-cadherin and the affinity between EPHB-positive and EPHRIN-B-positive cells
EPHRIN-mediated reverse signaling also contributes to tumorigenicity by inhibiting apoptosis.
For example, stimulating EPHA with EPHRIN-A1 induces endothelial cell migration and vascular assembly through PI3K-mediated activation of the Rac1 GTPase
Since the discovery of their crucial role in tumor-associated angiogenesis, EPH receptors and EPHRIN ligands have become an exciting new area of anti-angiogenesis drug development
For example, inhibiting the Dll4/Notch as well as the EPHRIN-B2/EPHB4 signaling pathways was shown to result in a more efficient reduction of tumor size, vessel perfusion, and mural cell recruitment

('E2F1', 'FOXO3', 'increases')
Puma expression is normally kept very low, but can be induced by several transcription factors including p53, p73, E2F1 and FOXO3a, whereby it can induce an apoptotic response.

